          |    | FR - EN - DE - SP - CN - PL - NL |  HOME                         Enter depending on your status             PATIENT / INDIVIDUAL   MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL   WEB PUBLISHER                  The services offered by HON        HONcode  HONcode certification: Improving the quality of online health information     HONsearch  Search only reliable and trustworthy medical websites    HONtools  Use our free services to enhance and improve your online experience    HONtopics  Access a varied list of reliable medical/health topics               The Health On the Net Foundation (HON) promotes and guides the deployment of useful and reliable online health information, and its appropriate and efficient use. Created in 1995, HON is a non-profit, non-governmental organization, accredited to the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations. For 20 years, HON has focused on the essential question of the provision of health information to citizens, information that respects ethical standards. To cope with the unprecedented volume of healthcare information available on the Net, the HONcode of conduct offers a multi-stakeholder consensus on standards to protect citizens from misleading health information.                http://www.hon.ch/home1.html  last modified:  May 3  2017  Ethical policies  Contact  © HON 2018       #^$  Want to live your best life?   Get the WebMD Daily newsletter for health tips, wellness updates and more.      Subscribe   By clicking Subscribe, I agree to the WebMD Terms & Conditions & Privacy Policy and understand that I may opt out of WebMD subscriptions at any time.    close   Skip to main content                 Check Your Symptoms    Find A Doctor    Find Lowest Drug Prices     Health A-Z  Health A-Z     Health A-Z     Common Conditions    ADD/ADHD    Allergies    Arthritis    Cancer    Cold, Flu & Cough    Depression    Diabetes    Eye Health    Heart Disease    Heartburn/GERD    Pain Management    Sexual Conditions    Skin Problems    Sleep Disorders    View All      Resources    Symptom Checker    Expert Blogs and Interviews    Message Boards    Questions & Answers    Insurance Guide    Find a Doctor        Featured Topics      Assessment  Get Help for Migraine Relief       Video  Doctors Tweet Things They've Heard From Patients       Drugs & Supplements  Drugs & Supplements     Drugs & Supplements     Find & Review    Drugs    Supplements      Tools    Manage Your Medications    Pill Identifier    Check for Interactions      Drug Basics & Safety    Commonly Abused Drugs    Taking Meds When Pregnant        Featured Topics      Slideshow  10 Diseases Vaccines Can Prevent       Slideshow  Vitamins & Minerals From A - Zinc       Living Healthy  Living Healthy     Living Healthy     Diet, Food & Fitness    Diet & Weight Management    Weight Loss & Obesity    Food & Recipes    Fitness & Exercise      Beauty & Balance    Healthy Beauty    Health & Balance    Sex & Relationships    Oral Care      Living Well    Women's Health    Men's Health    Aging Well    Healthy Teens    Fit Kids        Featured Topics      Slideshow  How Your Bad Habits Can Affect Your Health       Slideshow  Best and Worst Salads       Family & Pregnancy  Family & Pregnancy     Family & Pregnancy     All About Pregnancy    Getting Pregnant    First Trimester    Second Trimester    Third Trimester    View All      Parenting Guide    Newborn & Baby    Children's Health    Children's Vaccines    Raising Fit Kids    View All      Pet Care Essentials    Healthy Cats    Healthy Dogs    View All        Featured Topics      Expert Blog  Dangers After Childbirth -- What to Watch For       Video  3 Things to Keep in a Diaper Bag       News & Experts  News & Experts     News & Experts     Health News    Genetic Testing: Do You Really Want to Know?    New Drugs May Be Big Advance Against Lung Cancer    Animal Feces Found in Counterfeit Makeup    Man Has World's First Case of Super-Gonorrhea    SCAD: The Heart Attack That Strikes Young Women      Experts & Community    Message Boards    Expert Blogs    News Center        Featured Topics      Special Report  America's Pain: The Opioid Epidemic       Newsletters  Sign Up to Receive Our Free Newsletters       Mobile Apps    Subscriptions        Sign In   Subscribe   My Profile    My Tools    My WebMD Pages    My Account    Sign Out               Share on Facebook Share on Twitter Share on Pinterest WebMD - Better information. Better health. Subscribe                Vaping Is Dangerous, but Many Just Don't Care  One popular product contains about as much nicotine as a pack of cigarettes.           Trending Videos          4 Ways to Fight Midday Fatigue           Where Trans Fats Hide           Health Benefits of Turmeric          Top Stories          Former First Lady Barbara Bush Dies at Age 92        Don't Quit Coffee Over Cancer Risk News      20 Million Eggs Recalled      Genetic Testing: Do You Really Want to Know?      New Drugs May Be Big Advance Against Lung Cancer      House Mice May Carry Superbugs      PCOS Tied to Mental Health Issues      Eating Pasta Linked to Weight Loss      Who Lives Longer -- Night Owls or Early Birds?      Man Has World's First Case of Super-Gonorrhea     View more Top Stories       Trending Topics      Bipolar Disorder    Shingles    Migraine    Opioids    Leukemia    Skin Cancer    Heart Failure    Cardiac Arrest    Heart Attack    Type 1 Diabetes    Gout    ADHD Symptoms       Conversations     Second Opinion | WebMD Expert Perspectives   #160;      Is a Boring Relationship Bad?  Our relationships expert shares insight.   Read Full Post     Leslie Becker-Phelps, PhD | Relationships       Twitter Favorites   Follow Us        WebMD  55 hours ago   @WebMD  So you've had your cholesterol tested -- what do the levels actually mean? https://t.co/sq8LGOKBy9  https://t.co/P1rhpcyO0K   Reply  Retweet  Favorite       WebMD  56 hours ago   @WebMD  You know stress can affect your emotions, but do you know the physical toll it can take? https://t.co/8IwTjzo3L3  https://t.co/tYpZduKNca   Reply  Retweet  Favorite         Facebook Most Recent   Follow Us          WebMD  1 hour ago     How do you juggle a hectic schedule and stay on track with healthy eating? 5 food hacks our doctor swears by:   View Post         WebMD  4 hours ago     Yes, you really can cry tears of blood. But it isn’t so much a disease as a symptom. Possible causes include:   View Post        Special Report       America's Pain: The Opioid Epidemic  Those in pain watch and worry how they’ll get help.       Quiz    What is the primary reason opioids are prescribed?     Weight Loss     Pain Relief     ADHD   Submit      You are correct!     Incorrect   The correct answer is: Testicular  Opioids are often used for acute pain, such as short-term pain after surgery.       Physician Directory Find a Physician in Addison, TX Asthma & Allergy Specialist Anesthesiologist Cardiologist Chiropractor Dermatologist Ear, Nose and Throat Doctor Emergency Medicine Endocrinologist Family Physician Gastroenterologist General Practitioner General Surgery Geriatrician Hematologist/Oncologist Infectious Disease Specialist Internist Neurologist Obstetrician & Gynecologist Ophthalmologist Orthopaedic Surgeon Pain Management Doctor Pediatrician Plastic Surgeon Physical Therapist Psychiatrist Pulmonologist Radiation Oncologist Radiologist Rheumatologist Sleep Specialist Sports Medicine Physician Urologist Search   Featured Health Topics          BRAIN & NERVOUS  Foods That Help You Focus  Adding these foods and drinks to your diet may improve attention, memory, and brain function.       ATRIAL FIBRILLATION Treatment Options DEEP VEIN THROMBOSIS Symptoms & Dangers of DVT SCHIZOPHRENIA How Common Is It? CHILD ADHD Tips to Stay On Task MENOPAUSE How to Manage Symptoms SEXUAL HEALTH Causes of Erectile Dysfunction       Want to live a healthy lifestyle?  Subscribe to free WebMD newsletters.     Select your newsletters: WebMD Daily Men's Health Women's Health    Subscribe   By clicking Subscribe, I agree to the WebMD Terms & Conditions & Privacy Policy and understand that I may opt out of WebMD subscriptions at any time.     Living Healthy        MEN'S HEALTH  Flat Abs Moves for Men         HEALTH & BALANCE  Can't Concentrate?         DIGESTIVE HEALTH  Best and Worst Foods for Your Liver         TRYING TO CONCEIVE  Facts to Help You Get Pregnant         ORAL HEALTH  Protect Your Pearly Whites         WOMEN'S HEALTH  Superfoods for Women         SMOKING CESSATION  Serious About Quitting Smoking?         SEXUAL HEALTH  What's Killing Your Sex Drive?         HEALTH & BALANCE  Make Changes That Stick          Popular Tools       BMI Calculator      WebMDRx -- Find Lowest Drug Prices      Ovulation Calculator      Fitness Calorie Counter      Food Calorie Counter      Due Date Calculator     SYMPTOM CHECKER  Take the first step and see what could be causing your symptoms. Then learn about possible next steps.  Get Started    Health A - Z      ADHD    Allergies    Alzheimer's    Anxiety Disorders    Arthritis    Asthma    Back Pain    Cancer    Cholesterol    Cold, Flu, & Cough    COPD    Depression    Diabetes    Digestive Disorders    Eye Health    Heart Health    Heartburn/GERD    Hypertension    Mental Health    Migraines    Multiple Sclerosis    Oral Care    Osteoporosis    Psoriasis    Rheumatoid Arthritis    Sexual Conditions    Skin Problems    Sleep Disorders     See All Health Conditions          Health Solutions    Cancer Survivorship    Aging and Addiction    Penis Curved When Erect    Allergy Relief for Your Family    Clinical Trial Q&A    Keep Your Heart Heathy    Back Pain Relief?    Have Trouble Sleeping?    Survive the Spring    What's an OMS    Help for Your Heartburn    Therapy at Home?    Bent Fingers?    Spring Allergies    Precise Cancer Therapy     More from WebMD    Tips to Better Manage Your Migraine    The Stress of Caregiving    Immunotherapy for Cancer    Yeast Infection Assessment    Foods That Fight Inflammation    Pediatric Focal Onset Seizures    Living Better With Migraine    Diabetes and Silent Heart Attacks    Fertility Quiz    Pre-Pregnancy To-Dos    Avoid Allergy Triggers    Treating Advanced Prostate Cancer    Small Steps to Manage Your Blood Sugar              Visit WebMD on Facebook      Visit WebMD on Twitter      Visit WebMD on Pinterest     Policies Privacy Policy Editorial Policy Advertising Policy Correction Policy Terms of Use About Contact Us About WebMD Careers Newsletter Corporate WebMD Health Services Site Map Accessibility WebMD Network Medscape Medscape Reference MedicineNet eMedicineHealth RxList OnHealth BootsWebMD WebMDRx First Aid WebMD Magazine WebMD Health Record Dictionary Physician Directory Our Apps WebMD Mobile WebMD App Pregnancy Baby Allergy Medscape TheHeart For Advertisers Advertise with Us Advertising Policy   © 2005 - 2018 WebMD LLC. All rights reserved. WebMD does not provide medical advice, diagnosis or treatment. See additional information.             undefined undefined undefined undefined undefined undefined undefined undefined#^$           Cookies on the BBC website  The BBC has updated its cookie policy. We use cookies to ensure that we give you the best experience on our website. This includes cookies from third party social media websites if you visit a page which contains embedded content from social media. Such third party cookies may track your use of the BBC website. We and our partners also use cookies to ensure we show you advertising that is relevant to you. If you continue without changing your settings, we'll assume that you are happy to receive all cookies on the BBC website. However, you can change your cookie settings at any time.    Continue    Change settings   Find out more                          Accessibility links   Skip to content  Accessibility Help        Sign in      Notifications         BBC navigation    Home    Home    News    News    Sport    Weather    Shop    Earth    Travel    Capital    iPlayer    Culture    Autos    Future    TV    Radio    CBBC    CBeebies    Food    iWonder    Bitesize    Travel    Music    Earth    Arts    Make It Digital    Taster    Nature    Local    Tomorrow's World   Menu      Search    Search the BBC   Search the BBC                       News   BBC News Navigation     Sections           Home      Video      World      UK      Business      Tech      Science      Stories      Entertainment & Arts      Health   selected     World News TV      In Pictures      Reality Check      Newsbeat      Special Reports      Explainers      The Reporters      Have Your Say     More sections     In Pictures     Reality Check     Newsbeat     Special Reports     Explainers     The Reporters     Have Your Say       Advertisement        Health            Top Stories      Man gets 'third face' in French transplant          Jérôme Hamon is the first patient to have two facial transplants and says he is doing well.    17 April 2018  From the section Europe      Related content    Video 'I feel very well' What's it like living with a face transplant?    Full article Man gets 'third face' in French transplant                  Does vaginal seeding boost health?    Does vaginal seeding expose babies to good bacteria or is it too dangerous?    17 April 2018  From the section Health       Full article   Does vaginal seeding boost health?               Women 'really are the fairer sex'    Women from European descent are twice as likely to be naturally blonde as men, a new study suggests.    16 April 2018  From the section Health       Full article   Women 'really are the fairer sex'        Ketamine's 'rapid help' for depression      16 April 2018  From the section Health  96 comments    Full article Ketamine's 'rapid help' for depression      Excess drinkers 'can lose years of life'      13 April 2018  From the section Health  703 comments    Full article Excess drinkers 'can lose years of life'      Why being overweight could damage your liver      13 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Why being overweight could damage your liver                 Video  The paramedic couple who mostly collect bodies     11 April 2018  From the section Stories    Full article The paramedic couple who mostly collect bodies       Genes found for deadly heart condition     15 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Genes found for deadly heart condition       Video  Going through the menopause aged 11     13 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Going through the menopause aged 11       Why some cancers are 'born to be bad'     12 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Why some cancers are 'born to be bad'       Exercise 'benefits next generation'     11 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Exercise 'benefits next generation'       YouTube star opens up on social anxiety     11 April 2018    Full article YouTube star opens up on social anxiety       Advertisement      Advertisement     Watch/Listen          Video  1:52        Video 1:52   'My son comes alive at theme parks'     19 April 2018  From the section Hampshire & Isle of Wight    Full article 'My son comes alive at theme parks'          Video  2:30        Video 2:30   The four-year-old 'poster boy' with dementia     18 April 2018  From the section Coventry & Warwickshire    Full article The four-year-old 'poster boy' with dementia          Video  1:36        Video 1:36   'I felt guilty that I was still alive'     19 April 2018  From the section Stoke & Staffordshire    Full article 'I felt guilty that I was still alive'          Video  1:00        Video 1:00   First double face transplant patient 'well'     17 April 2018  From the section Europe    Full article First double face transplant patient 'well'          Video  3:05        Video 3:05   Reece's top tips for ADHD     17 April 2018  From the section Scotland    Full article Reece's top tips for ADHD          Video  3:24        Video 3:24   A solution to one of America’s biggest problems     16 April 2018  From the section US & Canada    Full article A solution to one of America’s biggest problems                 Warning over world's hottest chilli     10 April 2018  From the section Health   comments    Full article Warning over world's hottest chilli             Gut instinct: Why I put my poo in the post     14 April 2018  From the section Health    Full article Gut instinct: Why I put my poo in the post      Features & Analysis              How 'ninja polymers' are fighting killer superbugs        17 April 2018  From the section Business     Full article How 'ninja polymers' are fighting killer superbugs             Helping burns survivors feel confident in their own skin      17 April 2018     Full article Helping burns survivors feel confident in their own skin             Mums share breastfeeding images online        16 April 2018  From the section South East Wales     Full article Mums share breastfeeding images online                 Why do people enjoy taking part in chilli-eating contests?    Chilli-eating competitions are proving popular in the UK, despite potential risks.    10 April 2018  From the section Newsbeat     Full article Why do people enjoy taking part in chilli-eating contests?             Why are sugar and alcohol about to get more expensive?        5 April 2018  From the section Health     Full article Why are sugar and alcohol about to get more expensive?             How Amsterdam is reducing child obesity        2 April 2018  From the section Health     Full article How Amsterdam is reducing child obesity       Our Experts     'Wake-up call' over liver disease risks due to weight   One in eight middle-aged people in the UK could have a potentially serious form of liver disease linked to being overweight.  13 April 2018    Fergus Walsh  Medical correspondent            BBC Future          A British rocket base returns to life  Once a Cold War relic, it’s launching once more               What if all guns disappeared?  Here’s what the world would look like          Advertisement     Watch/Listen          Video  1:52        Video 1:52   'My son comes alive at theme parks'     19 April 2018  From the section Hampshire & Isle of Wight    Full article 'My son comes alive at theme parks'          Video  2:30        Video 2:30   The four-year-old 'poster boy' with dementia     18 April 2018  From the section Coventry & Warwickshire    Full article The four-year-old 'poster boy' with dementia          Video  1:36        Video 1:36   'I felt guilty that I was still alive'     19 April 2018  From the section Stoke & Staffordshire    Full article 'I felt guilty that I was still alive'          Video  1:00        Video 1:00   First double face transplant patient 'well'     17 April 2018  From the section Europe    Full article First double face transplant patient 'well'          Video  3:05        Video 3:05   Reece's top tips for ADHD     17 April 2018  From the section Scotland    Full article Reece's top tips for ADHD          Video  3:24        Video 3:24   A solution to one of America’s biggest problems     16 April 2018  From the section US & Canada    Full article A solution to one of America’s biggest problems       Share with BBC News      Send us an SMS or MMS to +44 7624 800100     Email us at haveyoursay@bbc.co.uk      Follow Have Your Say on Twitter      Follow Us    Facebook    Twitter          RSS             Advertisement     Ads by Google           More from BBC News            From the section  Business    Wynn Resorts adds three women to board    Full article Wynn Resorts adds three women to board  Wynn is continuing to grapple with sexual misconduct allegations regarding former head Steve Wynn.              From the section  UK Politics    Plastic straw and cotton bud ban proposed    Full article Plastic straw and cotton bud ban proposed  Plan for a ban in England is announced as Commonwealth leaders are urged to tackle plastic waste.              From the section  Health    Man gets 'third face' in French transplant    Full article Man gets 'third face' in French transplant  Jérôme Hamon is the first patient to have two facial transplants and says he is doing well.              From the section  Family & Education    Narrow vocabulary 'hits pupils' grades'    Full article Narrow vocabulary 'hits pupils' grades'  Research suggests four out of 10 pupils in their first year of secondary have limited vocabulary.              From the section  Technology    Facebook seeks to face scan Europeans    Full article Facebook seeks to face scan Europeans  Amid a privacy crisis, Facebook asks permission to expand use of facial recognition technology.              From the section  Science & Environment    Planet-hunter launches from Florida    Full article Planet-hunter launches from Florida  The US space agency's Tess satellite lifts off on a mission to find thousands of new worlds.              From the section  Entertainment & Arts    Graham Norton leads tributes to Dale Winton    Full article Graham Norton leads tributes to Dale Winton  He thanks the TV star for giving him "the best bit of showbiz advice I ever got".              From the section  Magazine    The holiday village run by spies    Full article The holiday village run by spies  An idyllic holiday resort on the banks of the Red Sea was a base for Israeli spies with a secret mission.             BBC News Navigation   Sections     Home      Video      World      World Home   Africa    Asia    Australia    Europe    Latin America    Middle East    US & Canada         UK      UK Home   England    N. Ireland    Scotland    Wales    Politics         Business      Business Home   Market Data    Global Trade    Companies    Entrepreneurship    Technology of Business    Business of Sport    Global Education    Economy         Tech      Science      Stories      Entertainment & Arts      Health   selected     World News TV      In Pictures      Reality Check      Newsbeat      Special Reports      Explainers      The Reporters      Have Your Say          BBC News Services    On your mobile    On your connected tv    Get news alerts    Contact BBC News              Explore the BBC     Home    Home    News    News    Sport    Weather    Shop    Earth    Travel    Capital    iPlayer    Culture    Autos    Future    TV    Radio    CBBC    CBeebies    Food    iWonder    Bitesize    Travel    Music    Earth    Arts    Make It Digital    Taster    Nature    Local    Tomorrow's World             Terms of Use    About the BBC    Privacy Policy    Cookies    Accessibility Help    Parental Guidance    Contact the BBC    Get Personalised Newsletters    Advertise with us    Ad choices     Copyright © 2018 BBC. The BBC is not responsible for the content of external sites. Read about our approach to external linking.                     #^$            Tap here to turn on desktop notifications to get the news sent straight to you.                            EDITION             WELLNESS          MEDITATION    MENTAL HEALTH    THERAPY    STRESS AND STRESS MANAGEMENT    SLEEP AND WELLNESS               The 4 Types of Bosses… And How To Manage Up To Them   By PureWow , Editorial Partner               How Sanitary Are Steam Rooms And Saunas, Anyway?               It Matters That This Pro Athlete Is Open About His Eating Disorder               These Simple Tips Can Trick You Into Eating Healthier               7 Things You Should Always Do After Having Sex               11 Little Ways To Support Someone With High-Functioning Depression               25 ‘Impolite’ Things People Do Because Of Anxiety   By The Mighty , Editorial Partner               These Athletes Nix The Notion That Mental Illness Makes You Weak               Why Do Some People Need More Sleep Than Others?               What You Should Know If You Love Someone Who Has Panic Attacks               Michelle Obama’s Daily Habit Is All About Happiness                  FilippoBacci via Getty Images     9 Signs Therapy Is Actually Working            Facebook     A Grief Bot Could ‘Resurrect’ My Dead Husband. No Thanks.   By Ann Brenoff            andresr via Getty Images     So THAT’S Why Your Accent Gets Stronger When You’re Drinking            vwPix via Getty Images     7 Of The Highest-Rated Water Bottles With Filters On Amazon   By Amanda Pena            UNSPLASH PHOTO VIA JURICA KOLETIC     25 ‘Weird’ Things People Do Because Of Anxiety   By The Mighty , Editorial Partner            Prasit photo via Getty Images     What Colleges Need To Do To Make Student Mental Health A Priority   By Lindsay Holmes            sturti via Getty Images     What Millennials Say About Their Parents During Therapy   By Brittany Wong            PeopleImages via Getty Images     7 Things You Should Know If You Love Someone Who Gets Migraines            Getty Images     If You Say This During An Apology, You’re Doing It Wrong   By Kelsey Borresen            Amazon     7 Of The Highest-Rated Sound Machines With Alarm Clocks On Amazon   By Brittany Nims            Christopher Polk via Getty Images     The One Thing Kate Hudson Can’t Live Without In The Morning   By Abigail Cuffey            Anchiy via Getty Images     You’re Not An Idiot For Speaking To Your Dog In A Baby Voice, Study Suggests   By Brittany Wong            Getty Images/Twitter     8 Ways To Trick Yourself Into A Morning Workout            Ben Gunsberger via Getty Images     Why Is It Called A ‘Cesarean Section’ Anyway?   By Caroline Bologna            Illustration Gabriela Landazuri/HuffPost Photos: Courtesy of CBS Netflix Serial HBO Robyn Von Swank     This Is Your Brain On True Crime Stories   By Paige Smith            pixelfit via Getty Images     Everyone Argues. Here’s How Persuasive People Do It Differently.   By Brittany Wong            Chalabala via Getty Images     Should You Take A Vitamin Every Day?   By Paige Smith            Twitter     16 Tweets That Will Make Introverts Nod In Agreement   By Sarah Bourassa            MichaelSvoboda via Getty Images     Get To The Things You Love — Fast   By RYOT Studio  Presented by Sensodyne® Rapid Relief           pepifoto via Getty Images     This Is Why Your Hands Are Always Cold                       Subscribe to HuffPost’s wellness email  Your guide to taking care of your mind and body so you can take on the world.                                       PREVIOUS  NEXT    Page 1 2 3 4     MOST SHARED         Stephen Colbert Thinks He Has Proof That Trump Watches His Show           CBS         What The Southwest Flight Can Teach Us About Oxygen Masks           Mark Makela / Reuters         ‘Childhood Ruined’: Scientologists Reportedly Behind Neopets           Getty         Karen McDougal Released From Contract Restricting Her From Discussing Trump Affair           Jon Kopaloff via Getty Images         GOP Spending Against Obamacare Plummets In 2018 Elections           Nicholas Kamm/Getty Images          WHAT’S HOT         Trump’s Tariffs Are Already Costing American Jobs           Carlos Barria / Reuters         Missouri Gov. Eric Greitens Seeks Restraining Order On His Own Attorney General           Whitney Curtis via Getty Images         Amy Schumer Tells Her Mom And Ellen DeGeneres All About Her Sex Life           EllenTube/Ellen         World’s First Sex Doll Brothel Caters To Those Who Don’t Want Human Touch           Lukas Schulze via Getty Images         Right-Wing Extremists Guilty In Terror Plot Against Muslim Refugees           Damon Scheleur / HuffPost         New ‘Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom’ Trailer Has A Bonkers Surfing Scene           YouTube         Military Officers Punished After One Appears To Re-Enlist Using Dinosaur Puppet           Facebook         The 5 Best New Netflix Shows Of April 2018           KC Bailey/Netflix                       ABOUT US    ADVERTISE    About Our Ads    Contact Us    RSS    FAQ    Careers    Archive    User Agreement    Privacy Policy    Comment Policy    HuffPost Press Room           ©2018 Oath Inc. All rights reserved.  HuffPost Lifestyle           NEWS     US News    World News    Business    Environment    Health    Social Justice         ENTERTAINMENT     Culture & Arts    Media    Celebrity    TV & Film       POLITICS     Congress    Donald Trump    2018 Elections    Extremism         COMMUNITIES     Queer Voices    Women    Black Voices    Latino Voices    Asian Voices         LIFE     Style & Beauty    Food & Drink    Parenting    Travel    Finds    Wellness    Relationships    Money    Home & Living         SPECIAL PROJECTS     Impact: Project Zero    Impact: This New World    Highline    Listen to America    Podcasts       VIDEO      FROM OUR PARTNERS     Sleep & Wellness    Outspeak    What's Working: Purpose + Profit    The Power of Humanity    Difference Maker 100         OPINION  Expert analysis and commentary to make sense of today's biggest stories.      NEWSLETTERS  Sign up here to have the best stories delivered straight to your inbox.      HUFFPOST PERSONAL  First-person essays, features, interviews and Q&As about life today.            عربي (Arabi)    Australia    Brazil    Canada    Deutschland    España    France    Ελλάδα (Greece)    India      Italia    日本 (Japan)    한국 (Korea)    Maghreb    Mexico    Quebec    United Kingdom    United States    South Africa                  Get breaking news alerts  Download our app  Go to mobile site                                                                                                 #^$   Please enable cookies.    One more step  Please complete the security check to access www.avmla.org                                       Why do I have to complete a CAPTCHA?  Completing the CAPTCHA proves you are a human and gives you temporary access to the web property.    What can I do to prevent this in the future?  If you are on a personal connection, like at home, you can run an anti-virus scan on your device to make sure it is not infected with malware.  If you are at an office or shared network, you can ask the network administrator to run a scan across the network looking for misconfigured or infected devices.  Another way to prevent getting this page in the future is to use Privacy Pass. Check out the browser extension in the Firefox Add-ons Store .       Cloudflare Ray ID: 40deb4fc04cf68de  •  Your IP : 52.143.142.92  •  Performance & security by  Cloudflare      #^$     Skip to main content     GOV.UK uses cookies to make the site simpler. Find out more about cookies        GOV.UK   Search    Search          Menu    Departments  Worldwide  How government works  Get involved  Policies  Publications  Consultations  Statistics  Announcements                   Animal & Plant Health Agency       English    Cymraeg      Contact APHA  Vet Gateway  Animal disease test submissions and prices  Commercial products and services  Reporting notifiable disease in animals  Importing and exporting  Plant health controls and reporting pests and diseases  Plant varieties and seeds applications  Science at APHA  Sign up to animal disease alerts                 17 April 2018 — Blog post  Science blog: Celebrating votes for women: the early years  Flavie Vial explores the achievements over the last 100 years of the many women scientists within the agency.This blog looks at the early years (1930-1949).           13 April 2018 — News story  Asian hornet identified in Lancashire  An Asian hornet has been found in Lancashire and surveillance activity is underway.           11 April 2018 — Alert   Government Vets blog: Association of Government Vets (AGV) wellbeing survey launched!  Rebeca Garcia, President of AGV, talks about why all government vets, including OVs, should complete the Government Veterinarian’s Wellbeing Survey.           10 April 2018 — Press release  Ban on live animal exports for slaughter explored by government  The Environment Secretary has launched a call for evidence for a potential ban on the live export of animals for slaughter once the UK leaves the EU.           3 April 2018 — News story  New livestock service champions farm to fork traceability  Defra champions farm to fork traceability through new Livestock Information Service           5 February 2018 — News story  Avian influenza (bird flu) in winter 2017 to 2018  The latest updates on avian influenza (bird flu) in winter 2017 to 2018.        Latest     Cattle: TSE surveillance statistics   updated 18 April 2018   Research and analysis     Sheep: TSE surveillance statistics   updated 18 April 2018   Research and analysis     Goats: TSE surveillance statistics   updated 18 April 2018   Research and analysis      Get updates to this list  email  feed   Copy and paste this URL in to your feed reader      See all        What we do   We work to safeguard animal and plant health for the benefit of people, the environment and the economy.   APHA is an executive agency, sponsored by the Department for Environment, Food & Rural Affairs , the Welsh Government and The Scottish Government .  Read more about what we do        Follow us     Connect with APHA on Twitter     Connect with APHA on Facebook     Connect with APHA on YouTube     Connect with APHA on Storify     Connect with APHA on APHA science blog             Our policies      Animal welfare    Animal and plant health     See all our policies         Documents   Our announcements      Asian hornet identified in Lancashire    13 April 2018  News story      Trust Your Vet on antibiotic treatment    5 April 2018  News story      See all our announcements      Our consultations      Charges for statutory services provided by APHA:  proposed changes    10 April 2018  Consultation outcome      Statutory plant health services: changing fees in England and Wales (2017)    1 March 2018  Consultation outcome      See all our consultations      Our publications      Cattle: TSE surveillance statistics    18 April 2018  Research and analysis      Sheep: TSE surveillance statistics    18 April 2018  Research and analysis      See all our publications      Our statistics      Data and methodology    18 April 2018  Official Statistics      Latest national statistics on tuberculosis (TB) in cattle in Great Britain - quarterly    14 March 2018  National Statistics      See all our statistics           Our management         Chris Hadkiss  Chief Executive           Ian Hewett  Director of Service Delivery         Kath Webster  Director of Scientific Services         Dave Webster  Finance Director         Simon Hall  Director for EU Exit and Trade              Contact APHA      Contact details for APHA Offices     Contact form  https://www.gov.uk/gov...          Make an FOI request   Read about the Freedom of Information (FOI) Act and how to make a request   Check our previous releases to see if we’ve already answered your question  Make a new request by contacting us at:       Freedom of Information (FOI), Environmental Information Regulations (EIR) and Subject Access requests    ATI Enquiries Manager  Animal and Plant Health Agency Woodham Lane  New Haw  Addlestone  Surrey, KT15 3NB     Email  enquiries@apha.gsi.gov.uk            Corporate information     Equality and diversity  Complaints procedure  Research at APHA  Our governance  Office access and opening times  Corporate reports  Transparency data      Jobs and contracts    Working for APHA  Jobs     Read about the types of information we routinely publish in our Publication scheme .
      Find out about our commitment to publishing in Welsh .
      Our Personal information charter explains how we treat your personal information.
      Read our policy on Social media use .
      Find out About our services .            Is this page useful?  Yes this page is useful   No this page is not useful   Is there anything wrong with this page?   Thank you for your feedback    Close       Help us improve GOV.UK  Don’t include personal or financial information like your National Insurance number or credit card details.   What were you doing?     What went wrong?         Close          Help us improve GOV.UK  To help us improve GOV.UK, we’d like to know more about your visit today. We’ll send you a link to a feedback form. It will take only 2 minutes to fill in. Don’t worry we won’t send you spam or share your email address with anyone.   Email address     Don’t have an email address?           Services and information   Benefits  Births, deaths, marriages and care  Business and self-employed  Childcare and parenting  Citizenship and living in the UK  Crime, justice and the law  Disabled people  Driving and transport    Education and learning  Employing people  Environment and countryside  Housing and local services  Money and tax  Passports, travel and living abroad  Visas and immigration  Working, jobs and pensions     Departments and policy   How government works  Departments  Worldwide  Policies  Publications  Announcements        Support links   Help  Cookies  Contact  Terms and conditions  Rhestr o Wasanaethau Cymraeg  Built by the Government Digital Service     Open Government Licence  All content is available under the Open Government Licence v3.0 , except where otherwise stated     © Crown copyright            #^$       Navigation   Hide Navigation   Home  Who we are  How we help   SCVMA Angel Fund  Angel Fund case of the month  Mary Edna Boydston Fund  Therapy Animals & READ Program   READ program  Pet facilitated therapy  Featured Team  Become a Sponsored AHF Pet Partner Team  What we look for in a pet partner team  Apply for us to visit  Therapy Dogs - Born or Made?    Disaster relief and preparedness   Disaster preparedness  Pet information form    Wildlife assistance  Education   Human Animal Bond  Pet Loss and Bereavement  Quality of Life  End of Life    Scholarships   2013 Orangutan Caring Veterinary Scholarship Winners  Orangutan Caring Veterinary Scholarship  Thelma Zalk Veterinary Scholarship  Dorothy & Charlie Nichols Veterinary Scholarship    Past projects      Memorials   Pet memorials  Tributes  Recognitions    How you can help   Donate to us  Become a member   Planned giving – Bequests    Health information   Animal Cavalcade & Today’s Animal Health  Pet care video  Pet care handouts  Latest pet care videos    DVM programs  News & Events   News  Events     Blog  Contact us  About us   AHF history  Our supporters  Our board of trustees  Terms of use  Privacy statement      Donate now Help us help animals in need         Angel Fund Case of the month Forty years of helping those less fortunate provide care for their pets.… Read more  Therapy Animals and READ program Therapy animals helping others.… Read more  Pet memorials Memorialize your cherished pet with a donation.… Create your own memorial  Tributes Pay tribute to a friend, family member, or colleague with a donation.… Create your own tribute       Together We Can Make a Difference in the Welfare of Animals  Our Mission: To help pets and wildlife in times of need.  Our Goals:   Encourage the human-animal bond  Promote public education about animals  Forward the study and advancement of animal health  Aid domestic animals and their owners  Support projects aiding wildlife   The AHF supports these goals with active involvement and financial contributions to programs, which are in accord with the foundation’s ideals, and directly promotes these goals within the community.                        What can we do to help animals and people?   Right here in our neighborhoods, animals and animal lovers confront obstacles that threaten their ability to provide for basic needs.  Universally, wildlife species struggle to adapt to environments that may no longer support their needs … they need help.    Pet lovers know the benefits of interacting with animals, but many struggle to provide basic care for their pets … they need help. Some people fail to realize the benefits pets provide to people … they need help.  By joining forces we can consolidate efforts to improve the lives of animals and those who care about them. We can help.     Latest News   Dr. Lowell Novy receives AHF's Cortese-Lippincott Award AAHA’s Canine Vaccination Guidelines Two dogs and a ring-necked dove help Orange County high schoolers de-stress after test    Blog RSS Feed           Information on this website is for educational purposes only. The Animal Health Foundation does not provide veterinary services or guidance via the Internet. Please consult your veterinarian for veterinary care of your pets.  Copyright © 2018 Animal Health Foundation a 501(c)(3) not-for-profit organization. All rights reserved. Foundation Website by Beyond Indigo Pets .     #^$    The USDA APHIS VS Centers for Epidemiology and Animal Health (CEAH) Web site  has moved to:  http://www.aphis.usda.gov/about_aphis/programs_offices/veterinary_services/ceah.shtml  Please bookmark this new site. Your browser will be re-directed in 5 seconds.           #^$              eera  welcome  what we do…  who we are…   mark bronsvoort  ian handel  Gustaf Rydevik  paul bessell  amy jennings  samuel thumbi    research themes  publications  collaborators  grants  Livestock networks in Cameroon  recruitment  Epidemiology of Bovine Tuberculosis in Cameroon  blog  contact               eera epidemiology, economics and risk assessment          pages   welcome  what we do...  who we are...  mark bronsvoort  ian handel  Gustaf Rydevik  paul bessell  amy jennings  samuel thumbi  research themes  publications  collaborators  grants  Livestock networks in Cameroon  recruitment  blog  contact  projects   Epidemiology of Bovine Tuberculosis in Cameroon       you are here: eera     welcome      Welcome to eera – the epidemiology, economics and risk assessment group.  We are based at the Roslin Institute , part of Edinburgh University’s  veterinary school .  We study disease in animal populations to improve animal and human health  Our work involves field studies in the tropics, Europe, farms and markets throughout the United Kingdom; laboratory analysis and computer based modelling and simulations.  We answer questions as simple as ‘Is the population diseased?’  to as complex as long time-scale exotic disease import risk predictions.        manage   Log in  Entries RSS  Comments RSS  WordPress.org           Copyright © 2018 eera - All Rights Reserved Powered by WordPress · Atahualpa Theme by BytesForAll            #^$         TABLE OF CONTENTS  Exotic Pet Vet - Introduction   Exotic Pet Vet - About Us   Exotic Pet Veterinarian - Our Awards   Exotic Pet Veterinarian - Our Bios   Authentic Scottish Shortbreadn   Exotic Pet Vet - Veterinarian Information  aqua   Aquatic Medicine   Freshwater Fish Parasites   avian   Avian Index   20 Things You Must Know About Nutrition   Those Amazing Amazons   Avian Anatomy   Visual gender determination for African Grey parrots   Handling the Avian Emergency   Avian Medications: A to Z   The Importance of Avian Nutrition   Diseases of Baby and Juvenile Birds   Small Parrots in Health and Disease   Avian Cancer   The Challenges of Avian Medicine   Chlamydiosis   Proper Wing Clipping   CPR for Birds   Dairy Products and Birds   Diabetes in Birds   Five Most Common Aviary Diseases   DNA PCR Technology: Its Importance In Avian and Exotic Medicine   Bird Droppings   Egg Production: Avian Female Reproductive Question   Diseases Transmitted to Eggs   Medical Care of Emus Dromaius novahollandiae   Avian Endoscopy   Things You Can Tell from Feathers   Putting Together A First Aid Kit for Your Birds   Amazon Foot Necrosis   Avian Geriatrics   Giardia in Birds   Gout in Bugies   The Dog Days of Summer   Avian Incubation and Hatching   Avian Incubation and Hatching for the Practitioner   Avian Influenza   Love Sick   Aviary Management   The Purple Martin   Avian Medicine Today   Mites and Lice   Exotic Newcastle's Disease   The Importance of Bioceuticals   Avian Orthopedics   Psittacine Beak and Feather Disease Today   Avian Pediatrics   Avian Pediatrics Questions   Feather Picking   Practical Avian Pediatrics   Avian Pregnancy   Avian Plasma Proteins   Sarcocystosis   It's Bird Breeding Season   Seizures in African Grey Parrots   Gram's Stain Interpretation   Strange Facts You Probably Don't Know About Birds   Stuff You Probably Don't Know, But Should   Avian Surgery   Thyroid Testing in Avian Species   Top Ten Bird Killers   Diseases of the Uropygial Gland   West Nile Virus: What You Must Know For Your Bird's Sake   Standardization of Wing Clipping for Psittacines   Avian Gastric Yeast   Zinc and Parrots   dvms   Vet to Vet Index   Ferret Hemostasis   DMG: A Nutrient for the New Millennium   Metabolic Bone Disease in Exotic Pets   Exotics: Their Beauty is More than Skin Deep   general   Water   primate   Primate Index   Nutrition & Husbandry of Callitrichids   Caring for Marmosets & Tamarins   Callitrichid Conservation   Drug Dosages for Marmosets and Tamarins   Hand Rearing Marmosets   A Tale of Grief   Special Care for Newborn Callitrichids: Care for Injured, Abandoned, Chilled or Ill Infants   Exotic Pet Veterinarian - Our Photo Album   The Cotton-topped Tamarin   reptile   Reptile Index   Reptile Aggression   Herp Bite Wounds   Blister Disease in Boas and Pythons   Pet Selection: Reptiles for Children   Reptile Exercise   Female Lizard Reproductive Surgery   The Green Iguana   Choosing a Herp Vet   Metabolic Bone Disease   Is That Normal?   Iguana Nutrition   Prolapsed Hemipenis in Snakes   Reptile Reproduction   Snake Nutrition   Reptile Socialization: What Pet Owners Need to Know   Socialization Among Reptiles   Strange Medicine: Tales From a Herp Vet's Casefiles   Trends in the Health and Well-Being of Herps   Nutrition of Turtles and Tortoises   Reptiles: Zoonoses   smanimal   Small Animal Index   Small Mammal Anesthesia   Healthy Teeth Mean Healthy Bunnies   Sugar Glider Diets   Ferret Lymphoma Protocols   Rabbit Anatomy   Rabbit Medicine   First Aid for Rabbits   Diseases of Ferrets, Rabbits, Guinea Pigs and Hamsters   Vaccine Reactions in Ferrets      #^$      Skip to main content          Utility Menu    Veterinarians & Students    Golden Retriever Lifetime Study         Search                  Main navigation    Our Impact    Dogs    Cats    Horses    Wildlife      Who We Are    People    Financials    Partners      Grants    Find a Study    Apply for a Grant      Stories & News    AnimalNEWS magazine    Golden Retriever Lifetime Study eUpdate      Ways To Give    Donate    Circle of Discovery    Memorial/Honor Gifts    Planned Gifts    Other Ways to Give        Donation Menu    Donate    Send A Tribute     Search                  Imagine a world where all cancers are treatable and more cures are possible     Unite to Fight Animal Cancer          Previous          Help All Animals Live Healthy Lives  When you donate today, the Blue Buffalo Foundation will generously match it up to $75,000 — making your gift go twice as far to help fund research that improves the health of all animals, and contributes to our Golden Retriever Lifetime Study.  Donate Now              Mousie's Legacy: Hope in the Fight Against Hemangiosarcoma  Danielle Walraven happily describes her pack of Italian greyhounds as Velcro dogs – they love to be on her lap, on the couch, snuggling in bed, getting under her feet, and basically being as close to her as possible. Her love of these miniature versions of greyhounds, and the health problems they can face, is what brought her to Morris Animal Foundation.  Read More              Morris Animal Foundation Launches Unite to Fight Animal Cancer Campaign  We not only imagine a world where all cancers are treatable and more cures possible, we are working hard to make that happen.  Read More              Help All Animals Live Healthy Lives  When you donate today, the Blue Buffalo Foundation will generously match it up to $75,000 — making your gift go twice as far to help fund research that improves the health of all animals, and contributes to our Golden Retriever Lifetime Study.  Donate Now              Mousie's Legacy: Hope in the Fight Against Hemangiosarcoma  Danielle Walraven happily describes her pack of Italian greyhounds as Velcro dogs – they love to be on her lap, on the couch, snuggling in bed, getting under her feet, and basically being as close to her as possible. Her love of these miniature versions of greyhounds, and the health problems they can face, is what brought her to Morris Animal Foundation.  Read More              Morris Animal Foundation Launches Unite to Fight Animal Cancer Campaign  We not only imagine a world where all cancers are treatable and more cures possible, we are working hard to make that happen.  Read More              Help All Animals Live Healthy Lives  When you donate today, the Blue Buffalo Foundation will generously match it up to $75,000 — making your gift go twice as far to help fund research that improves the health of all animals, and contributes to our Golden Retriever Lifetime Study.  Donate Now     Next 1 2 3     At Morris Animal Foundation, we work every day to improve and protect the health of animals through scientific innovation, education and inspiration. We are committed to fighting animal diseases worldwide in species ranging from cats and dogs to horses and alpacas; amphibians and wildcats to anteaters and elephants.  Discover the advances in health we've made for these animals.              Dogs  Dogs              Cats  Cats              Horses  Horses              Wildlife  Wildlife         What We Do    Morris Animal Foundation is a nonprofit organization that invests in science to advance animal health. Since our founding in 1948, we have invested more than $118 million toward 2,600+ studies that have led to significant breakthroughs in diagnostics, treatments and preventions to benefit animals worldwide.    Who We Are        Our Global Impact  Previous   Institutions funded           Species helped by country/region           10 major diseases we study           Institutions funded           Species helped by country/region           10 major diseases we study           Institutions funded         Next 1 2 3         $118 Million Invested  Our studies have led to significant breakthroughs in diagnostics, treatments and preventions to benefit animals worldwide.  Learn About Health Studies        2,600+  Studies Funded               20,000+  Species Benefit From Our Work       Our Partners  Our Partners help make the world a brighter place for animals.                                        view All Partners         Make an Impact  Help advance the health of animals worldwide to give them a healthier tomorrow.  Donate Now        Honor Your Loved Ones  Your memorial or tribute gift to someone who has touched your life directly supports our programs and the health of animals around the world.  Send a Tribute                  Footer Menu    Our Impact    Veterinarians & Students    Who We Are    Golden Retriever Lifetime Study    Grants    Careers    Stories & News    Financials    Ways to Give    Contact      Our Mission  We are bridging science and resources to advance the health of animals. With your help, we are saving animal lives.  Donate Now    Be the First to Know!  Receive updates about our latest animal health research.  Sign Up Now    Golden Retriever Lifetime Study  Access your study information.  Login        720 S. Colorado Blvd, Suite 174A  Denver , CO  80246  United States   Phone  800-243-2345     © 2018 Morris Animal Foundation  | Privacy Policy    Social Menu    Facebook    Instagram    LinkedIn    Twitter            #^$              NetVet & the Electronic Zoo originate from the vivid imagination and late night
web-surfing of Dr. Ken Boschert , a Veterinarian at Washington University's Division of Comparative Medicine, located in St. Louis,
Missouri. Among this server's Web
Pages are numerous views of Veterinary Medical and Animal resources
available on the Internet and beyond. See What's New and be sure to visit this week's best animal-related Web site,
the Pick of the Litter .     For a quick text
overview of many of these resources, see the Veterinary Medical Section of the World Wide Web Virtual
Library . This server is designed as an educational resource
for the entire Internet community. If you cannot find what you are looking for here, try Searching the Web , or
consider your local public library. If you need advice concerning your animals, ALWAYS consult your local veterinarian !                 This site best viewed with  or       Ken Boschert, DVM Associate Director  Washington University Division of Comparative Medicine Box 8061, 660 South Euclid Avenue  St. Louis , Missouri 63110 USA        Text Version  About NetVet  Feedback  Statistics  Recognition  Web Picks  Disclaimer      Visit the AVMA's Care for Pets site for 
additional information on veterinary medicine and animal health.     Copyright  ©  1994-2016, Ken Boschert, DVM   All Rights Reserved  #^$      PBS                       PBS.org  Home  Video  Shows  TV Schedules   Shop   Donate   PBS.org                                    While high-tech health care has begun to 
		improve the quality of life for some animals, many a pet's life ends simply because 
		inappropriate behavior leads the owner to "put the animal to sleep." On this Web site you 
		can find out more about the problem, review questions and answers with specialized animal 
		behaviorists, and test your knowledge of more exotic animals.     Text Animal Hospital Home | Don't Blame Your Pet  Ask the Behaviorists | Name that Animal | Resources | Transcript    NOVA Online | Editor's Picks | Previous Sites | Join Us/E-mail | TV/Web Schedule  About NOVA | Teachers | Site Map | Shop | Jobs | Search | To print      NOVA Online is produced for PBS by the WGBH Science Unit   © 1998 WGBH | created February 1998       Support provided by            For new content visit the redesigned  NOVA site                                      #^$Error - list not found The VETMED list at LISTSERV.IUPUI.EDU could not be found in the database. Either the list has been deleted, or an internal error occurred in the web server.#^$               A
                        comprehensive guide to holistic pet care...    To make sure you have the alternative
                      medicine information and pet care resources you
                      need.  It's as important as your critters are!    (Besides, natural healing is
                    good for you too.)         Look




                              for the underlinings! - these are the currently
                              fleshed-out sections.                          Natural
Healing,




                                  Healthy Living for Your Animals  -  Can you really
                                apply alternative medicine to pets?  Yes, just like with humans - on top of The Basics...    Opening




                                    remarks (My Take on Natural Healing, The
                                    Purpose of This Website)     Understanding




                                    the Basics - How Bodies Work (Part 1)     Understanding




                                    the Basics - How Bodies Work (Part 2)     Applying




                                    the Basics - Think "Holistic Healing" When
                                    Things Go Awry     Healthy




                                    Living - What It Is, How to Ensure Your
                                    Animals (and You?) Enjoy the Benefits of It         Link to useful
                                      article:  '7
                                      Alternative Medicine Treatments for
                                      Animals: A Short Guide for Caring for Your
                                      Pet Naturally'          By




                                        Treatment Method  -  Information on a rainbow of healing
                                      modalities to try, books to peruse, things
                                      to use:      Acupressure/Acupuncture,




                                        Reflexology     Chiropractic,
                                        Massage     External
                                        Forces:  Hydrotherapy, poultices,
                                        magnetics, color, etc.    Emotion-based




                                      Healing:  EFT




                                      (Emotional Freedom Techniques) , GNM
(German




                                      New Medicine)    Herbal,




                                        Nutritional     Homeopathy/Flower




                                        Essences     Touch




                                        Therapies/Visualization:  TAT (Tapas Acupressure Technique), Tellington TTouch , Visualization for Others (including
                                      information on The Silva Method), Applied Kinesiology (Muscle Testing)      Information
                                      on Detoxifying          RADIATION


                                            HELP:   What
                                          to do for exposed pets (and people)...           VETERINARIAN'S




                                BEST HOLISTIC REMEDIES for




                              over 1000 ailments - Treat your pets at home with
                              confidence    CLICKER
TRAINING




                                  SECRETS EXPLAINED Free




                                ecourse, FAQ, & ebook with explanatory
                                photos, by experts who know how to teach    REIKI
HOME




                                  STUDY COURSE Save




                                $1000s on Reiki training with online lessons by
                                two experienced teachers (includes email
                                support)                            By
                        Animal  -  Discussions
                      and resources for specific critters:    Birds     Cats     Dogs     Horses
(and




                          Other Equines)     Other Critters (there are
                        a zillion! — but I'll try to help
                        with what you might need...  Rabbits, goats,
                        reptiles, hamsters, fish, hedgehogs, etc.)         Best




                          stories  of the animal-human bond                 By
                        Ailment  -  Suggestions
                      for where to turn for each type of complaint:    Behavioral (Aggression,
                        barking, depression/anxiety, destructiveness, jealousy,
                        licking, etc.)      Emergencies
                        (Bleeding/wounds, broken bones, burns, dehydration,
                        poisoning, shock, temperature extremes, etc.)      Internal/External (Allergies, bladder control, cancer, constipation /diarrhea, Cushing's disease , diabetes, fleas, hair balls,
                        heart trouble, kidney




                          failure , motion sickness, overweight, parasites,
                        pregnancy/birthing, seizures ,
                        skin problems, vomiting, etc.)      Musculoskeletal
                        (Arthritis, broken bones, hip dysplasia, strains, etc.)     Neutering, Heat,
                        Pregnancy, and Neonatal Critter Care     A Word about
                        Immunizations...      Bonus
                            for humans:   Digestive
System




                            Problems             Resources  -  How to get what you need to
                                help your pet!:    Books on all kinds of topics related to alternative
                                  medicine (categorized by topic, animal,
                                  treatment method;  and including
                                  resources for humans that can be applied to
                                  animal healing) [also




                                    a means of supporting this site]      Websites




                                  of interest     Products (where
                                  to get what you need; with a special section
                                  on repelling unwanted critters gently)      Practitioners : 
Professional
associations




                                  of holistic pet care practitioners, registries
                                  of animal healers worldwide (including a
                                  section on how to prepare for your visits to
                                  veterinarians and other health professionals)      Training : 
Videos,




                                  courses, and educational programs worldwide    Find
Holistic




                                      Vets in Your Area:      (If
no




                                          suitable entries appear and you're
                                          willing to travel, try a zip code from
                                          another area... or try one of the
                                          directories on the Holistic




                                            Veterinarians page.  You'll
                                          have to phone the veterinarian's
                                          office ahead of time to determine what
                                          manner of holistic services they
                                          offer.)              GREAT DOG MOVIE!: See Training page for a review of a fun and instructional DVD
                                film for the whole family on healthy dog
                                nutrition...  eat,  drink,  and wag
                                  your tai l        MORE...               Discussion




                          Forums  - Meet and
                    talk to others about alternative healing and the wonderful
                    animals in your lives - share what
                    you know, ask about what you need to know.  Behind
the
Computer




                        Screen  - In case you'd like
                    to know how this all got started...  Getting
in




                        Touch  - One person can only
                    do so much...  If you have any resources to add or
                    expertise to offer, please get in touch - especially,
                    to make this site accessible to people in as many countries
                    as possible.  Thank you!!              SEARCH




                        THIS SITE OR THE WEB:                     Web    www.AlternativePetHealth.com                     Remember the name... AlternativePetHealth.com                  Ye Olde
                    Disclaimer: Expressed herein are the opinions of a
                  "layperson", and whoever else happens to write for this
                  site...  I'm not taking responsibility for your
                  pet's health - consider the contents educational material;
                  take them with a grain of salt; consult your medical
                  professional, etc.; learn ... and do what you think is best.  Also...  I have the greatest respect and affection for
                  the veterinarians I've utilized, and few of them have been
                  "holistic" - so please don't misconstrue any frustration I
                  exhibit as my being down on mainstream vets!  I just
                  always wish and hope for more enlightenment in their training
                  and individual delving.  Thank you, doctors, for all the
                  care that you do give!                 Copyright 10/2000
                    ad infinitum - Gordon Pioneering        #^$               slimlife componentes   Latest    How do cats show affection?  Car restraints for dogs  Dealing with cracked and fractured teeth in dogs Is your cat right-pawed or left-pawed?         Facebook     Instagram     Pinterest     Twitter                                         Health  Nutrition  Training  Lifestyle  Ambassadors  Contests   Enter a Contest  Contest Winners  Rules & Regulations     Library   Digital Magazine  Articles   Canine  Feline     Blog  Video Gallery     Contact   About Us  Submissions & Guidelines  Advertising  Subscriptions  Social Media  Fundraising     Subscribe   New Subscription  Renew Subscription  Digital Subscriptions  Change Address  Digital Sample  Marketplace                                 FREE Natural Health Info   Browse our A to Z Library      Buy the New Issue Today!   Free Shipping      Animal Wellness Ambassadors   Help support rescue organizations      Weekly Woof Newsletter   Sign up for News, Articles, Products, & Deals!                   Maintain his dental health – naturally!  Along with a healthy high quality diet, there are a…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Harnesses for dogs  Take a look at the “who, why, what and where”…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Pom Pom Chewy  This kindly Pomeranian is recognized worldwide for his striking “foxlike”…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Should we be de-sexing our dogs?  In North America, spaying and neutering are generally regarded as…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Choosing quality pet food for your dog or cat  Making optimal dietary choices for your pet is crucial to…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Natural help for anxiety  Anxiety can impact your dog’s quality of life and result…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Essential oils for your dog  Essential oils can be very beneficial to dogs. Here’s a…  READ MORE  READ MORE         Avoiding danger at dog parks  Who doesn’t enjoy taking their dogs to local dog parks?…  READ MORE  READ MORE                                  Search for:                            The 4 Pillars   Health  Nutrition  Training  Lifestyle    Contests   Contest Winners  Rules & Regulations    Library   Articles  Blogs  Digital Magazine    Subscribe   New Subscription  Digital Subscriptions  Digital Sample  Change Address  Marketplace    Ambassadors   Become an Ambassador  Order an Event Kit  Gallery  Find an Ambassador                               Facebook     Instagram     Pinterest     Twitter      MENU     Health  Nutrition  Training  Lifestyle  Ambassadors  Contests   Enter a Contest  Contest Winners  Rules & Regulations     Library   Digital Magazine  Articles   Canine  Feline     Blog  Video Gallery     Contact   About Us  Submissions & Guidelines  Advertising  Subscriptions  Social Media  Fundraising     Subscribe   New Subscription  Renew Subscription  Digital Subscriptions  Change Address  Digital Sample  Marketplace           Back      The 4 Pillars   Health  Nutrition  Training  Lifestyle    Contests   Contest Winners  Rules & Regulations    Library   Articles  Blogs  Digital Magazine    Subscribe   New Subscription  Digital Subscriptions  Digital Sample  Change Address  Marketplace    Ambassadors   Become an Ambassador  Order an Event Kit  Gallery  Find an Ambassador         Enter to WIN 1 of 20 Great Prizes!     Name    First     Last   Email *   Address (Optional)     Street Address    Address Line 2    City    State / Province / Region    ZIP / Postal Code   Afghanistan Albania Algeria American Samoa Andorra Angola Antigua and Barbuda Argentina Armenia Australia Austria Azerbaijan Bahamas Bahrain Bangladesh Barbados Belarus Belgium Belize Benin Bermuda Bhutan Bolivia Bosnia and Herzegovina Botswana Brazil Brunei Bulgaria Burkina Faso Burundi Cambodia Cameroon Canada Cape Verde Cayman Islands Central African Republic Chad Chile China Colombia Comoros Congo, Democratic Republic of the Congo, Republic of the Costa Rica Côte d'Ivoire Croatia Cuba Cyprus Czech Republic Denmark Djibouti Dominica Dominican Republic East Timor Ecuador Egypt El Salvador Equatorial Guinea Eritrea Estonia Ethiopia Faroe Islands Fiji Finland France French Polynesia Gabon Gambia Georgia Germany Ghana Greece Greenland Grenada Guam Guatemala Guinea Guinea-Bissau Guyana Haiti Honduras Hong Kong Hungary Iceland India Indonesia Iran Iraq Ireland Israel Italy Jamaica Japan Jordan Kazakhstan Kenya Kiribati North Korea South Korea Kosovo Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Latvia Lebanon Lesotho Liberia Libya Liechtenstein Lithuania Luxembourg Macedonia Madagascar Malawi Malaysia Maldives Mali Malta Marshall Islands Mauritania Mauritius Mexico Micronesia Moldova Monaco Mongolia Montenegro Morocco Mozambique Myanmar Namibia Nauru Nepal Netherlands New Zealand Nicaragua Niger Nigeria Northern Mariana Islands Norway Oman Pakistan Palau Palestine, State of Panama Papua New Guinea Paraguay Peru Philippines Poland Portugal Puerto Rico Qatar Romania Russia Rwanda Saint Kitts and Nevis Saint Lucia Saint Vincent and the Grenadines Samoa San Marino Sao Tome and Principe Saudi Arabia Senegal Serbia Seychelles Sierra Leone Singapore Sint Maarten Slovakia Slovenia Solomon Islands Somalia South Africa Spain Sri Lanka Sudan Sudan, South Suriname Swaziland Sweden Switzerland Syria Taiwan Tajikistan Tanzania Thailand Togo Tonga Trinidad and Tobago Tunisia Turkey Turkmenistan Tuvalu Uganda Ukraine United Arab Emirates United Kingdom United States Uruguay Uzbekistan Vanuatu Vatican City Venezuela Vietnam Virgin Islands, British Virgin Islands, U.S. Yemen Zambia Zimbabwe  Country                      ×      Choose your magazine format...    FREE Digital Magazine     UK Promo    Name *    First     Last   Email *   Would you like to Opt-In to our weekly newsletter? Yes please! No thanks.                   Single Print Issue  Continue to order page   Print Subscription  Continue to order page     X                                                                                                     #^$            Working Dogs Outfitter   Training Books & Videos   Free Trainer Directory     Tactical & Outdoor Gear  Online  Brand New All Pet Store  New Articles     Brand new hot deals!  Breed  Calendars & Misc. Gifts  Working Dog Forum     Updated New Book Titles!  Veterinary Library  Free User Blogs          The international magazine for and about working and sporting dogs -- and the people who love them.       Home    Working Dogs Home  Welcome  Privacy Statement  Advertising Prices  Terms  Forum Usage  Contact Us     Outfitter    Working Dog Equipment Outfitter    1st Aid and Trauma Supplies  Competition Training  K-9 Training Equipment  Leather & Training Collars  Leashes & Lines  Schutzhund Training Equipment  Sleeves & Gauntlets  Remote Training Collars  Working Dog Equipment     Working Dog Bookstore  Books, Ramps, Videos, & More  Featured Books & Videos  Breed Calendars & Gifts  Veterinary Medicine Library  Select Veterinary Books  Hot New & Used Deals  Obedience Training  Breed Specific Specialty Stores    Australian Cattle Dog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Australian Shepherd Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Belgian Malinois Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Bernese Mountain Dog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Border Collie Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Bouvier des Flandres Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Bulldog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Cane Corso Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Doberman Pinscher Books, Gifts, & Apparel  German Shepherd Dog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  German Shepherd Favorites  Greater Swiss Mountain Dog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Hound Dog Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Labrador Retriever Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Mastiff Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Newfoundland Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Pit Bull Books, Gifts, & Apparel  Rottweiler Books, Gifts, & Apparel     Complete Pet & Vet Supply Store  Horse & Ranch Related Books & Videos  New Saddles and Tack Store  Misc & Used Horse Related Deals  Tactical & Outdoor Equipment Outfitter  The People Outfitter  Childcare & Childrens Store     Articles    Articles Home  Dog Business Articles  Dog Breeding & Genetics Articles  Genetics Articles  German Shepherd Articles  Herding Articles  Canine History Articles  Police K-9 Articles  Dog Law Articles  General Dog Information Articles  Dog Nutrition Articles  Raising & Training Puppy Articles  Resources  Search and Rescue Articles  Schutzhund Articles  Service / Assistance Dog Articles  Sledding & Pulling Articles  Sporting Activities  Tracking & Scentwork Articles  Training Articles  Training Resources  Traveling with Dog  Veterinary Health  FAQS     Ads & Services    Ads & Services  Classifieds  Showcase Ads  Puppies & Dogs  How to Advertise Here  Web Design and Maintenance     Features    Free Working Dog Blog  Newsletter  Event Calendar  Weather  Community  Public Forums  Free Email  Chat     Links  Headline News          Match ALL words  Match ANY word                Working Dog Ads  Free Working Dog Blog  Working Dog Forums  Working Dog Events  New Working Dog Articles                           Gourdo Tough Dog Toy Gourdo Toy - From interactive play, to treat dispensing, to gum massaging, this durable toy does it all. Tri-Tronics Sport Junior G3 Tri-Tronics Sport Junior - Rugged design makes it the ideal remote trainer for yard drills or working with hunting dogs.                       Articles Home  BUSINESS  Breeding & Genetics  German Shepherd  Herding  History  Police & K9  General  Nutrition & Diet  Puppies  Resources  Search and Rescue  Schutzhund  Service Dogs  Sledding & Pulling  Sporting Activities  Tracking & Scentwork  Training  Veterinary Health  New This Month                    Add Working Dogs Headlines to your Site  Click Here for Details                Subscribe to the Working Dogs Newsletter    EnterYour e-mail address         Subscribe  Unsubscribe                        Pro Training Shop   The Dog Shop    Tactical and Outdoor Gear Online  Veterinary Library  Brand New All Pet Store  Breed  Calendars and Misc. Gifts  Updated New Book Titles!  Our Horse Gear    Dog First Aid    Australian Cattle Dogs   Australian Shepherds   Belgian Malinois   Bernese Mountain Dogs   Border Collies   Bouvier des Flandres   Bulldogs   Cane Corso   Doberman Pinschers   German Shepherd Dogs   Hound Dogs   Labrador Retrievers   Mastiffs   Newfoundlands   Pit Bulls   Rottweilers   Swiss Mountain Dog                          Search Amazon:   Books  Everything  Magazines  Toys  Outdoor Living  Music  VHS  DVD  Software  Sporting Goods  Apparel  Electronics  Office Stuff  Automotive  PC Hardware  Health Care  Photo  Tools  Video Games  Wireless    Enter Keyword:              Canine Trauma                       Book Review: Complementary and Alternative Veterinary Medicine   By Lori Mikajlo         Complementary and Alternative Veterinary Medicine: Principles and Practice size> by Allen M. Schoen and Susan G. Wynn; 1997; hard cover; $84.95 is available from Working Dogs Book Store.    ALTHOUGH this text is slated more for the veterinarian with an interest in exploring and/or implementing alternative care within their practice, its a wealth of information for the lay-person seeking detailed descriptions and applications of the various modalities, as well.  Chapters cover fundamentals, nutrition, physical medicine (traditional Chinese medicine, acupuncture , chiropractic care, massage therapy, and TTouch as its applied to canine, feline, and equine), energetic medicine (magnetic therapy and photon therapy), botanical medicine (Western herbal, Chinese herbal, and Ayurvedic ), homeopathy, Bach flower remedies, aromatherapy , vaccinations, and various holistic practices as applied to exotics, equine, and small animal practice. Such noted individuals as Dr. Susan Wynn, Dr. Allen Schoen, Dr. Wendell Belfield, Dr. Jean Dodds, Dr. Peggy Fleming, and Dr. Cheryl Schwartz, to name but a few, lend their expertise to this comprehensive text.  Included at the end of the text is an extensive resource directory that contains web site address', suppliers, recommended reading, organizations, diagnostic software, and periodicals related to this subject. Again, geared more for the veterinarian, but can certainly be useful to the lay-person.  This is a large text and rather pricey, but certainly worth it for those who are serious about obtaining information on alternative/complementary veterinary care and want a more detailed view than what they may find in other texts. Language is technical at times depending on the chapter, but will still hold the lay-person's interest with its facinating content.                   Images  Facebook  Free Software  2008 Calendar  Acupuncture  Allen               HOME | SEARCH | BOOK & Gear | Classifieds | Articles | Health | Resources | About Us | Privacy Statement   All site contents and design Copyright 1996 - 2018
          © Working Dogs Please feel free to link from your site to any of the pages on Working Dogs domain in a non-frame presentation only. You may not copy, reproduce, or distribute any site content in any form. Copying and distribution of any Working Dogs domain content may be done only with publisher's consent. For information on reprinting articles please contact Working Dogs .  Page Last Rev. June 20, 2013        #^$                          Home Events Articles CVMG Members Modalities Links Gallery Contact Us                You are here: Home                                  Introducing CVMG    The C omplementary V eterinary M edicine G roup ( CVMG ) was officially inaugurated in July 2000, under the auspices of the South African Veterinary Association. The objective of the group is to act as a forum for discussion and exchange of information with regards to alternative  therapies for animals, for both the general public and the veterinary  profession.    In recent years there has been a tremendous increase in interest and demand for alternative animal therapies,  and the internet is providing much information. Many people are searching for a holistic and integrative  approach to their pet's health.  It is essential that concerned owners are referred to an appropriately trained veterinarian.  The welfare of the animal  is paramount. To this end the CVMG encourages a high standard of training and competency in the integrative  treatment of animals ( cats, dogs and birds; cattle, sheep and horses) .    The group encourages professional training and education of those vets interested and the CVMG has successfully held courses in veterinary acupuncture  and  homeopathy  since 2005. We also hosted a well-known holistic veterinarian  from America, as well as the current world authority in vaccination programmes  for  dogs  and cats, at the World Veterinary Congress held in Cape Town in October 2011. The group is constantly sourcing certified courses in herbal medicine, Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM), homotoxicology and physical rehabilitation therapy, to name a few. Details of these are regularly updated on the CVMG website events page.                Search    Search...         Home Menu   Introducing CVMG                              Proudly created by  © 2018 [Login]      #^$             "Animals are the Spiritual Connection Between Humans and Nature."                                  Welcome   Welcome to Connections Reiki, thank you so much for visiting!  Here you can learn how to strengthen your Connection to your Animal Companions and to Mother Nature through Reiki healings, classes and discussion groups. We also offer Flower Essences; Crystal Healing; House Cleansing; Tarot and Oracle Readings; Pendulum Dowsing; Intuitive Communication; Pet Sitting; Gift Certificates and much more.  We hope you enjoy your visit, please don't hesitate to contact us at any time with any questions or comments.  Blessings,  Cristine   "Reiki Box"  If you would like to be included in our "Reiki Box", send me an e-mail and place "Reiki Box" in the subject line. Include the name of the Animal or Person, their general complaint, and your relationship to them.  A strip of paper with your info on it will be placed into a small wooden box with the Reiki symbols on it (the "Reiki Box") and Reiki will be sent to everyone in The Box nightly. Of course, Reiki will be sent to the Animal or Person's 'Highest and Best', and permission will be asked of the Animal or Person's Higher self.  When The Box gets full, a layer of the strips will be taken off the bottom and ceremonially burned, sending appropriate Blessings with them to Spirit.  All information will be kept in the strictest of confidentiality, and you will NOT be contacted by Connections Reiki or anyone associated with us for any other reason. If you wish to be on our Announcements mailing list, please send a separate e-mail with "Join Mailing List" in the subject line to the address above. If you would like to join our Discussion mailing list, there is a link to that in the footer of each page.   News    Reiki for Animal Lovers Workshop  Open to all regardless of experience, this workshop is perfect for animal lovers of every kind!  Pet parents  Vet techs  Groomers  Rescuers  Trainers  Dog walkers  Pet store associates  Animal care givers of all varieties!  Learn the basics of Reiki and how to apply it specifically to working with animals. If you are an animal care professional, a pet parent, or a volunteer rescuer, Reiki can help both you and the animals in your care. Reiki is great for animals of every kind, from common domestics like cats, dogs, ferrets, birds, small reptiles and amphibians, and 'pocket pets', to larger companion animals like horses, and even wildlife - as a rescuer or observer.  Whether you are completely new to Reiki, or are already attuned and would like the specialized animal Reiki information, this workshop is a great way to expand your experience.  Each student will receive all class materials and a single Level 1 Attunement. This workshop will NOT include the complete Reiki 1 information, students will receive a certificate of completion, rather than a Reiki 1 certification, and will NOT be able to continue directly to Reiki 2. However if students continue their Reiki journey with me, they will receive FULL credit for their tuition towards future Reiki Certifications.   Saturday March 14, 1-5pm.  The Natural Way, 6479 West Quaker Street, Orchard Park, NY 14127  1 session, 4 hours - $50  Please pre-register by calling ( (716) 785-2990) or e-mailing Cristine 
( cristine@theessenceofspirit.com ).  For more info see The Essence of Spirit's class pages.     Archived News   Keep up with Connections Reiki: follow our Facebook Page!   Navigate:   Home ~ Click this link or either of the header images to bring you back here.  About ~ I am a Reiki Practitioner and Animal Intuitive, and am proficient in the use of pendulums and TTouch to aid in Healings.  FAQ ~ Frequently Asked Questions Answered.  Animals ~ About my Companions and the other Animals I have worked with.  Code of Ethics ~ How I run my Practice, Business, and Life.  The 5 Reiki Precepts ~ Or My Version Thereof.  Calendar of Events ~ Stay updated on Classes and Special Events.  Services ~ Details of services offered, (including Reiki, Crystal Healing, House Cleansing, Tarot & Oracle Readings, Psychic Parties, Classes, Pendulums) appointments, rates, and payment. 10% of all fees collected will be donated to a local Animal Charity.  Pet Care ~ Here you will find some of my collected wisdom about the care of  some common (and some not so common) pets.  Library ~ Suggested reading: Books, Articles and Essays.  Links ~ Links to related sites, including local Animal Rescue/Adoption Associations, Rehabbers, Veterinarians, and animal friendly Pet Supply Stores.  Connect ~ How to get in touch with me by mail, e-mail or phone.  Testimonials ~ The Testimonials Page is being compiled now, contact Cristine if you have comments you would like included. Thanks!  News ~ Anything new going on with Me or the Site.      I am not a veterinarian; I can not diagnose medical issues, offer medical advice, prescribe drugs, or perform surgery.  Reiki is healing , not medicine , and should never be used in place of veterinary care. If your pet is ill or injured, call your veterinarian immediately .  All readings and personal information are kept strictly confidential.    [ Home ]
[ About ]
[ Connect ]
[ FAQ ]
[ Animals ]
[ Calendar ]
[ Services ]
[ News ]
[ Code of Ethics ]
[ 5 Reiki Precepts ]
[ Pet Care ]
[ Library ]
[ Links ]
[ Testimonials ]
[ Top ]  Join one of our Mailing Lists   Last updated Saturday, February 7, 2015  "Connections Reiki" and connectionsreiki.com copyright © 2007 - 2015 by Cristine Cook-Fireheart. All rights reserved. All photos and content on this website are copyright © Cristine Cook-Fireheart and are not to be used or published in print, on the web or in any other form. This web site may not be reproduced in any form, except as occurs in normal browser caching, without express written permission from the Owner. Misuse of private property will result in legal action.  connectionsreiki.com is best viewed with Chrome, Cookies, CSS and Java Script enabled, True Color, Screen Resolution 1024x768 or higher. Problems? E-Mail Cristine                          [ Go To Top ]        #^$         This page uses frames, but your browser doesn't support them.#^$               Sign In  Sign-Up               Welcome!    Close   Would you like to make this site your homepage? It's fast and easy...     Yes, Please make this my home page!    No Thanks    Don't show this to me again.    Close     Gold Bead Implantation in Small Animals  Terry Durkes, DVM 909 N. Western Avenue Marion, IN  46952, USA Tel: +1-765-664-0734 e-mail : durkes1@mcleodusa.net International Veterinary Acupuncture Society (IVAS) 25th
Annual Congress    (reprinted with Dr. Durkes' permission)  Introduction  Hip Dysplasia  Vertebral spondylosis, stifle problems and hip dysplasia  Elbow Arthritis  Osteochondritis and osteochondritis dessicans of the shoulder  Stifle arthritis  Carpal and tarsal problems  Epilepsy  Introduction  Modifying the original technique started by Dr. Grady Young, we began
gold bead implantation in 1975. The initial work was
done on a group of 7 German Shepherds, all of which had hip dysplasia.
When placing our gold beads, we did not know what
to expect or what exact angle to use. Because there was no charge, the
owners let us work with the dogs whenever we
needed. Over a 6-month period we established a protocol which gave good
results. Initially, we used only 2 gold
beads/acupoint. Later we discovered that younger dogs needed more gold
than older dogs. We then started placing 3 gold
beads/acupoint used in our protocol for hip dysplasia. In the initial protocol for hip dysplasia, we placed gold beads only in
GB29, GB30, and BL54. At that time, we were having a
success rate of about 75%. We started to expand the use of gold beads
because of this success. Today the gold bead implant
is our treatment of choice for hip dysplasia, osteochondritis and
osteochondritis dessicans of the shoulder, arthritis of the elbow
and knee, spondylosis of the back, wobbler disease, and epileptic
seizures. It is used in all types of arthritis and chronic
conditions, because these are conditions that all have excessive
negative charge (localised alkalosis). The use of gold beads in
a positive charged or acidosis condition only makes things worse. Gold
beads should never be implanted when tumours are
present or there is osteomyelitis. For gold bead implantation, we strongly recommend that the initial
implant be done under general anaesthetic and that the
patient be clipped and surgically scrubbed over the implant area. Some
veterinarians omit this and they have had some trouble
with infections at the implant sites. The implants can be done with 24-carat wire or by using Magraine gold
beads on transparent tape. The 24-carat wire has the
greatest positive charge because it is a purer form of gold, but it does
cost a lot more. I use Magraine gold beads on
transparent tape. It is much cheaper and we are getting good results.
Magraine gold beads are actually gold plated magnets
with a very low magnetic charge. We used to sterilise our gold beads
before doing the implants, but we do not do it today. As
long as we use gold beads that are placed on transparent tape, infection
has not been a problem. We smear each gold bead
with some antibiotic ointment and this may be why we have no trouble
after implanting non-sterile beads. We have implanted
several hundred thousand gold beads this way and have never had problems
with infection. It is much easier to load the syringe
with gold beads off of the transparent tape than from a sterilising
solution or other methods of sterilisation. In most situations, the gold beads are placed between muscle bellies and
not into the muscle. The only exception is when
placing the gold beads in some areas of the head, elbow, and knee. In
many of these areas the gold beads are placed just
under the skin. When placed there, it is easier for the beads to migrate
from their proper locations. The placements of the gold
beads are very precise. Misplacement by as little as 1/16th of an inch
greatly reduces the clinical effect. No blood should show when placing the needle into the acupoint, but some
should ooze from the point after implanting the
gold bead. Oozing should occur only after the needle is withdrawn from
the acupoint. If blood does not ooze from the
acupoints on withdrawal of the implantation needle, in my experience the
implant gives poor results. In successful cases, from
one to several drops of blood ooze from each point. The blood colour
varies from red to very black, depending on the degree
of congestion of blood and chi in the area. The darker the blood, the
more the chi and blood is congested there, and the more
pain is being caused from that point. When a point bleeds, it is
important to let it bleed. Once the congestion is corrected, the
bleeding stops.  Hip Dysplasia  This condition accounts for about 50% of the cases in which we implant
gold beads. Our cases ranged from 4 months to 17
years of age. Most dogs were large breeds, or dogs >50 pounds body
weight. We have treated 2 Pekinese dogs for hip
dysplasia. The size of the dog does not have a bearing on the success of
the gold bead implant. Age does have the greatest
effect on the success of gold bead implant. We break the age group into
3 classes. Under 7 years of age we have a 98%
success rate. From 7 to 12 years of age we have about 80% success rate
and from 12-17 years of age we have about 50%
success rate. The number one cause for our failures in hip dysplasia is
secondary degenerative myelopathy. Degenerative myelopathy is considered by most experts to be a totally
separate condition, but I have never seen it show up as
a condition by itself. There has always been another concurrent problem.
In my opinion, degenerative myelopathy begins as a
localised alkalosis in the hip joint. In a small percentage of the
dysplastic dogs, the localised alkalosis starts to involve the local
nerves and eventually spreads to the spinal cord. The alkalosis of the
cord eventually causes demyelination of the cord. At
some point we are unable to reverse the alkalosis and demyelination of
the cord. When this happens, there is a progressive,
irreversible degenerative myelopathy and the dog cannot walk. The gold
bead implant will reverse the degenerative myelopathy
in about 50% of the cases. We are not able to look at these dogs before
the implant and know which ones we can help. We
cannot help dogs if they are unable to support their weight and the rear
legs are basically reduced to skin and bone with very
little muscle. If the dogs still have some muscling and can
intermittently get up, we can help about 50% of them. An apparent but temporary success may follow gold bead implantation in a
small group of dogs with degenerative myelopathy.
They seem to be good for 3-9 months, but then they deteriorate. All such
dogs have been about 9 years old. I have spent
much time on degenerative myelopathy, but this is a major problem in
small-animal practice. Let it not deter you from doing
gold bead implants. When implanting gold bead for hip dysplasia, we begin with 4 basic
points: GB29, BL54, GB30, and GB33. These points
need treatment in all dysplastic dogs. Other points that need to be
implanted fall into 3 Zones. Zone 1 is dorso-anterior to
GB29. Zone 2 is dorso-anterior and dorso-posterior to BL54. Zone 3 is
dorso-posterior to GB30. GB31 and GB32 are the
main exceptions to the rule; they need to be treated in some dogs. The next set of points to be implanted are in 1-2 of three Zones around
the hips. These points usually are Ahshi / trigger points.
Zone 3 needs treatment least frequently. One rarely must use all 3
Zones. To find the next point, draw a line midway between
GB29 and BL54 and go dorsal 0.5-1.0 inch. If a point is sensitive, place
gold beads into it (A). Then search for point
tenderness midway between BL54 and GB30. Go dorsocaudal to this area
0.5-1.0 1 inch. Implant gold beads into any
sensitive point there (B). If point (B) does not show up, then there
usually are no more points in Zone 3. Then search for two sensitive points ventral and dorsal to point (A). Go
halfway between GB29 and point (A) and search
anteroventrally. Place gold beads in any sensitive point found. If there
are no more sensitive points, move halfway between
point (A) and BL54 and search anterodorsally. Implant any sensitive
points found there. Implantation of the hips is complete
when one can find no more sensitive points in the area. When implanting gold beads for hip dysplasia, both hips should be
treated at the same session. However, a single hip can be
implanted in special cases. For example, some dogs have one normal hip
and one bad hip. The bad hip may look like a
dysplastic hip, but such hips were usually have been traumatised by
their dam shortly after the birth of the pups. In those cases,
only the bad hip needs treatment. Traumatic injury of one hip that has
resulted in a femoral head resection or a hip replacement
surgery may need to be treated with gold bead implant similar to hip
dysplasia. When we treat hips with gold bead implants, we see mostly local effects,
and very little systemic effect. GB29, GB30, and
BL54 work locally on the joint and the other trigger points work mostly
on the surrounding muscle.  Vertebral spondylosis, stifle problems and hip dysplasia  About 30% of dysplastic dogs have vertebral spondylosis. On seeing a
possible canine candidate for gold bead implant for hip
dysplasia, always x-ray the back for spondylosis. For gold bead
implantation to be successful in such cases, one must treat
both the back and the hips. One must also look closely at the stifles. Many dysplastic dogs tear the
anterior cruciate ligament while trying to
compensate for the hips. Even though they show radiographic signs of hip
dysplasia, the major pain may be coming from a
torn anterior cruciate ligament. This is usually the case when one hind
leg has exaggerated pain. One must first repair the
cruciate ligament and then also implant the gold beads at the hips at
that time, or later. We usually repair the hips and knee at
the same time.  Vertebral spondylosis  This is the second most common type of arthritis that we treat. Even
though spondylosis occurs in cats and all sizes of dogs,
most cases are in the larger breeds of dogs. Spondylosis of the back
seems to be an especially big problem in Golden
Retrievers. Other breeds commonly affected are German Shepherds,
Labrador Retrievers, Rottweilers, Collies, Old English
Sheep dogs, Great Danes and Doberman Pinschers. These breeds account for
95% of my spondylosis cases. Most of these
have concurrent hip dysplasia. However, the incidence of hip dysplasia
is very low in Great Danes and Doberman Pinschers.
Therefore these two breeds usually have spondylosis only. Rottweilers
are a special problem breed. If they have hip dysplasia
or spondylosis, they most likely develop stifle problems and wobbler
disease also. In Rottweilers, these conditions can arise at
the same time, or may be spread out over several years. When doing the gold bead implant for spondylosis, we treat the inner
Bladder Channel and some points on the Governing
Vessel. Start implanting the beads at BL13 and implant each point back
to BL28. The Governing Vessel usually needs to be
treated in the area of the greatest amount of spondylosis. One may also
find trigger points between the inner Bladder Channel
and the Governing Vessel; these may need to be implanted. We see some dogs that have no ventral spondylosis but have arthritis of
the dorsal articular surface of the vertebrae. These are
implanted in the same way as for spondylosis of the back.  Elbow arthritis  This has many causes. The most common is failure to treat an ununited
aconeal process. We see relatively few cases in dogs,
but we can help most of them. The biggest problem is the long duration
that the condition before help is sought. Severe
ankylosis of the joint is present in 60-70% of the cases that we see. In
those dogs, implantation can often relieve pain, but most
continue to walk with a stilted gait. However, we can usually get them
to walk normally if we can implant them before
adhesions form in the joint. It is difficult to say for certain if the anconeal process should be
removed before gold bead implantation. We have implanted
elbows that have not had surgery and elbows after surgery. Even though
results in both cases were good, it is probably best to
remove the anconeal process before gold bead implantation in very young
dogs. When implanting gold beads, one must treat both the medial and lateral
side of the elbow. On the lateral side, the main points
to treat are LU05, LI11, SI09, TH05, TH10. Also a series of trigger
points distal to TH10 on the Triple Heater Channel need
to be treated. They are all in the area of the elbow. On the medial
side, the main points are PC03, HT03, SI08, and a series of
trigger points proximal and distal to SI08. Many of the gold beads in
the elbow area are placed just under the skin because of
the reduced muscle tissue in this area.  Osteochondritis and osteochondritis dessicans of the shoulder  These conditions respond well to gold bead implants. We tend to see
these animals before secondary complications set in.
When implanting gold beads on the shoulder, we only implant the lateral
surface. If joint mice are present, it normally is
unnecessary to remove them before implantation. When we first started implanting the shoulder, we implanted only one
acupoint, SI10. For about 10 years, we had 100%
success; then we had some failures. Today we implant several points
around the shoulder. I don't know why we have to
increase the number of points today compared to 14 years ago. Today the
main points implanted with gold beads are TH14,
TH15, LI15, LI16, SI09, SI10, SI11, SI12, SI14. Sometimes we have to
treat LU01 and LU02.  Stifle arthritis  This condition also responds well to gold bead implants. However, it is
very rare to get a pure arthritis of the stifle. Most stifle
arthritis is secondary to a torn anterior cruciate ligament. If one
implants gold beads on the stifle of a young dog with a torn
anterior cruciate ligament, one may have to repeat the implant 2-3 times
to have success. After critically evaluating the cases,
we feel that acutely injured anterior cruciate ligaments need surgical
repair as the method of choice. Later, one should implant
gold beads, if necessary. For stifle problems (arthrosis, stiffness, pain), gold bead implants
must be done on the medial and lateral sides of the joint.
ST36, ST35, GB34, GB33 and BL40 are the main points for treatment on the
lateral side of the stifle. Sometimes we find
many trigger points around this area; these need to be implanted also.
SP09, SP10, LV07 and LV08 are the main points for
treatment on the medial side of the stifle. There are also many trigger
points on the medial side of the stifle; these need to be
implanted also. If dogs have a torn anterior cruciate ligament for 3-24 months, we
repair it surgically and implant gold beads at the same time.
Success in these cases has been 100%. Surgical repair is not done if
dogs have a torn anterior ligament for a very long period,
and there is much capsular swelling with or without ankylosis. In those
dogs, we just implant the gold beads. Later, to achieve
the best results, about 50% of these dogs may require a second
implantation.  Carpal and tarsal problems  Those joints rarely need treatment with gold bead implant for arthritis.
However, those that we have implanted have all
responded.  Epilepsy  We implant gold bead implants in many dogs that have epileptic seizures.
This is a very difficult area to work in, but the results
can be very rewarding. The owners appreciate any improvement after
therapy because there are few other successful options
from which they can choose. Today, we see more complex types of seizure
than was the case 15-20 years ago. Today most
of our epileptic dogs have cluster seizures, whereas 20 years ago,
cluster seizures were rare. The change prompted a change in
our protocol for gold bead implant for seizures. The clustering seizure patient is similar to a fibrillating heart; each
seizure initiates from a different part of the brain. From the
Channel viewpoint, different Channels are involved with each episode of
seizures. Because of this, we treat all of the Channels
instead of just one or two Channels, as was the case 20 years ago. In
dogs with cluster seizures, gold bead implantation can
terminate or reduce medication in about 25 and 50% of them, respectively
but the remainder must continue their full doses of
medication. We see few problems in reducing the levels of phenobarb, primidone or
dilantin. However, potassium bromide (KBr) is most
difficult to reduce. The nervous system seems to become addicted to KBr
and its reduction usually induces seizures in the
patient. If, when reducing the KBr, the owner can tolerate the dog's
seizures for about 1 month, the dog usually stabilises.
However, most owners can not tolerate their dog's seizures, so we can
not expect to reduce KBr levels in many dogs. If a dog has a particular seizure pattern, such as a seizure every 4-6
weeks, one would gradually reduce the level of
medication. After the initial dose reduction, one would wait for 8-10
weeks before further reducing the dose. One must ensure
that the reduced dosage can still prevent seizures. If no seizures
occur, the dose can be reduced some more. GV20, GV14, GB20, GB14, BL04, BL06, and BL09 are the main head points
for gold bead implantation for seizures. We
may need to implant more head points (ST08, GV17, GV21, and GV23)
occasionally. We also treat 3-4 paravertebral
Shu-Association points that are specific for the Channels involved with
the seizure. However, for dogs with cluster seizures, we
treat all of the Shu-Association points, plus some Governing Vessel
points along the back. Because gold bead implants work slowly, dogs usually have some seizures
during the first week post implantation. However,
we see few seizures after one week post implant. Dogs that continue to
have seizures must be reassessed, and further
acupoints may need to be implanted. We were unhappy with the outcome of seizure treatment in many dogs.
However the owner was happy because our treatment
was able to reduce the number, frequency and severity of seizures.    Other Epilepsy Pages   [Quaid]  [Quaid's Implants]  [Patrick]  [Thyroid]  [Milk Thistle]  [Links]   Other Pages on This Website   [Home]  [Loch Vale History & Stories]  [Timmy-the-Cat]  [Memories of Patrick]  [Tribute]    (c) 2000 Loch Vale Collies           #^$                                        Enter your search terms   Submit search form          Web    www.hirudolab.com                  Hirudolab is looking for sales offices in countries .  If you currently operate a medical supplies business and are interested in becoming a distributor for Hirudolab then please contact us for further information  hirudolab@hirudolab.com           Welcome to Hirudolab    The first clinical use of Medicinal leeches (Hirudo medicinalis) occurred approximately 2500 years ago. This small invertebrate is particularly valuable for plastic and reconstructive surgery since it can produce a small bleeding wound that mimics a venous circulation in an area of compromised tissue. The leech produces a number of important substances which contribute to the special property of the bite, including an anticoagulant, a local vasodilator and local anaesthetic. And also leeches are used in cosmetics and pharmacology.              Our company is an international company based in TURKEY. We gained great experience in international trade since our establishment year 1999. In the year 2003, we started to sell Medicinal  leech in Turkey and overseas, and started to research  hirudotherapy, using Medicinal leeches in pharmacy & cosmetics and breeding leeches. After 5 years of continuous researches and experiments, we acquired singnificant knowledge about these themes and finally started to breed Medicinal leeches (Hirudo medicinalis, Hirudo verbana) under sterile laboratory conditions.          The production process is maintained in a sterile and controlled laboratory environment. We make microbiological and serological tests on all our products. Hirudolab Leeches are of the highest Clinical Standard.                  © copyright 2008   em@il : info@hirudolab.com  Web Design  by eRaY aTaÇ     #^$    On Sale!      Health Issues   Allergies  Bladder and Urinary  Cancer Support  Cushings  Ears, Eyes & Dental Health  Fleas, Ticks and Parasites  Heart Health  Immune Support  Kidney, Liver and Pancreas  Respiratory  More Health Conditions     Behavior   Aggression  Calming Aids  Coprophagia     Digestion      Joint Support   Joint Support for Dogs  Joint Support for Cats     Vitamins & Supplements   Cat Vitamins  Dog Vitamins  Antioxidants  Essential Fatty Acids  Immune Support  Hemp-Based Supplements     Skin & Coat   Skin Allergies  Skin and Coat Health  Hairballs  Tearstains  Wound Care     Misc   See All Products  Geriatric Pet Care  Grooming Products  Lawn Care  Pet Treats  Clearance - Overstock        877-573-8227 , Free Shipping on orders over $40. See Shipping Policies  here.                Home  My Account  Pet Health Articles  Call Us                    0 item(s)  $0                       On Sale!      Health Issues   Allergies  Bladder and Urinary  Cancer Support  Cushings  Ears, Eyes & Dental Health  Fleas, Ticks and Parasites  Heart Health  Immune Support  Kidney, Liver and Pancreas  Respiratory  More Health Conditions     Behavior   Aggression  Calming Aids  Coprophagia     Digestion      Joint Support   Joint Support for Dogs  Joint Support for Cats     Vitamins & Supplements   Cat Vitamins  Dog Vitamins  Antioxidants  Essential Fatty Acids  Immune Support  Hemp-Based Supplements     Skin & Coat   Skin Allergies  Skin and Coat Health  Hairballs  Tearstains  Wound Care     Misc   See All Products  Geriatric Pet Care  Grooming Products  Lawn Care  Pet Treats  Clearance - Overstock                Browse by Brand     Manufacturer   Thorne Veterinary  Veterinarian's Apawthecary  Animal Essentials  Ark Naturals  Bach Flower Rescue Remedy  Dr. Harvey's  Grizzly Pet Products  In Clover  Kala Health  Dr. Mercola Healthy Pets  NaturVet  Nordic Naturals  Nusentia  PetAlive  Ultra Oil for Pets  VetriScience  Zuke's Treats  Acu-Life         Top Sellers      1     Thorne Research CurcuVET-SA150 - 90 ct. - Curcumin Turmeric Supplement for Dogs        $25.00           VetriScience Vetri-Cardio Canine Chews for Dogs - 60 ct       $34.99         PetAlive Parvo-K for Dogs and Cats - 20 g.    $28.76                           Previous Next               Featured Products     NaturVet Digestive Enzymes & Probiotics for Dogs & Cats  - 8 oz. - powder     (7)       Our Price $24.99            Thorne Research Hepagen - Liver Support for Dogs & Cats - 120 ct.     (18)       Our Price $29.35            VetriScience Renal Essentials for Dogs - 60 tablets - Kidney Support     (1)       Our Price $31.99            VetriScience Cell Advance 880 - Antioxidants for Dogs - 120 ct.     (1)       Our Price $35.99            Dr. Mercola Curcumin Supplement for Dogs and Cats  - 4.31 oz     (3)       Our Price $33.99            Hemp Leaf for Dogs & Cats  - 2 oz. by Animal Apawthecary     (3)       Our Price $39.99            PetAlive Cushex Drops-S  - 2oz - Herbal Support for Dogs with Cushing's     (59)       Our Price $35.06            Hemp Powder for Dogs & Cats - Hemp ECS by Veterinarian's Apawthecary     Our Price $39.99            NaturVet Cat-Cal Nutritional Gel  - 5 oz.     Our Price $7.99             Welcome to Holistic Pet Info  Holistic Pet Info was founded in 2006 to help pet owners learn how nutritional supplements, vitamins, homeopathic and herbal remedies can help heal cats and dogs.  Be sure to visit our Health Care Articles to learn how natural treatments may help heal many common pet health conditions. We are committed to offering the best natural pet products available. We carry vitamins and supplements from Thorne Research, Vetri-Science, Kala Health, In Clover, NaturVet, Nusentia, Nordic Naturals, PetAlive and many other respected manufacturers.  Browse our categories to find natural products for joint support, liver disease, behavior problems and more.  We have vitamins, antioxidants, immune support and essential fatty acids to help keep your pets healthy! Holistic Pet Info ships to the US and Canada  and ships all orders from our offices in Colorado.               Sign Up for Exclusive Offers and Product News Click Here               Company Info   About Us  Contact Us  Become an Affiliate  Privacy Policy  Terms of Use  Product Index     Order Info   My Account  Order Status  Rewards Points     Help Center   Order Processing  Shipping Policy  Return Policies  Rewards Program   Resources     Stay Connected                    Copyright © 2018 Holistic Pet Info.                        Quick View        #^$                 Home      About      The Team      Courses      Links      Contact         Welcome  Thank you for considering a rewarding career within the animal therapy 
      field.  Here at ICAT we are excited at the prospect of helping you start your journey.  A few reasons to choose ICAT as your training provider as quoted by student 
      feedback:   small friendly classes  highly recommended  wonderful results achieved  students feel part of the team  fun practical sessions  incredible job satisfaction   If you wish to download a printed prospectus, please   For details of the new ICAT EQUINE PHYSICAL THERAPY AND MYOPRACTIC COURSE 
      please      ICAT is an accredited training provider with both OCN London and LANTRA 
      AWARDS.                             ICAT™ Aims   to offer sound instruction in both the theoretical and practical application of animal massage and manipulation therapies  to create opportunities for personal and professional development  to promote animal massage and myopractic manipulation as safe, effective methods of treating animals  to set levels of competency that are challenging yet achievable  to provide a stimulating, enjoyable and supportive learning environment            Copyright © 2018 The ICAT | Website by Devon Web Design        #^$  Original text Contribute a better translation    Course  Teacher  Charts  Books  Articles  Canine   Menu    français   EQUINE AND CANINE ACUPUNCTURE COURSES   INTERNATIONAL COLLEGE OF EQUINE and CANINE THERAPIES    Director: ALLAN MOFFATT B.SC., B.ACUP.       Equine(and Canine) Therapeutic Acupuncture  Course  (1 year Diploma)  Online Course in Horse (and Canine) Acupuncture and Acupressure  - Home and Professional  Note; This is a genuine, real training done over 12 months with full support during and after, with insurance coverage afterwards.  This is not just for veterinarians. But for any who love horses/dogs .Prices are affordable. email for details.  Course has been running for 8 years and teacher is fully trained acupuncturist with 30 years experience treating animals.      Equine therapeutic  acupuncture arises out of equine body-work methods such as massage,  manipulation,  physiotherapy and shiatsu (acupressure).  This is also suitable for veterinary acupuncture which  arises out of veterinary medicine.  It is also suitable for small animal acupuncture as the basic principles and skills remain  the same.  Select Language ​ ▼  April 19, 2018 Dry Needling is included.  Suitable for Red Light Photonic Equine Training.  includes Equine Cosmetic Acupuncture.(shape adjusting)    THE APPROACH OF THIS COURSE WILL BE:  • Learn the Energy flows within the horse body • Learn how to maintain and balance them  using: • Energy massage • Muscle release • Acupressure, shiatsu and Tui Na • Electrical and magnetic acupuncture modes • Laser and red-light laser •Dry needling technique • Traditional Chinese technique • Learn the acupuncture points and learn the ‘touch ‘ to find them. • Learn acupuncture treatments which work ,  for a very large range of horse ailments and conditions. • Learn to recognize these conditions.  • There will a brief introduction to Homeopathy and Spirit-work touching on  some aspects of herbal medicine.  • You will have the benefit of the practical knowledge and guidance of a  teacher of 30 yrs experience  working with horses after 5 years experience  working full-time with people.  This will deepen your understanding and love  of your horse .  It will be useful to improve horse performance such as in Eventing, Showjumping, Endurance,  and improve the horses appearance as in Showing and Dressage.   This 21 module (2 lessons each module) course is very suitable for horse lovers, and those already  working in this field such as chiropractors, physio, veterinary, farriers, nurses,  race-horse owners and laser owners.   Courses are online and mail via flashdrive: 1 module fortnightly (one theory, one practical) with  questions for reply.  There are over 300 videos available on Youtube.  Regular free Skype conference sessions replace the old idea of the 'block' practical attendance on campus.  Course is project based rather than exam based.  Equine Therapeutic Acupuncture course is available to students from many countries.  Translation can be done via Google Translate effectively.    Minimum requirements are ; experience with horses.  Basic computer skills. Basic horse anatomy.  Testimonial ; Acupuncture is actually very straight forward the way you explain it! Crystal; Coodenup. WA.  ESSENTIAL PRACTICALS ARE   AVAILABLE VIA VIDEO as below   Equine Acupuncture Training Live lessons Gb31 needling- HD  Watch this video here : http://youtu.be/V-4yf4cjFvI  See video for dog acupuncture here; http://youtu.be/yvT0P6mjO7w   Regular free Zoom conference sessions replace the old idea of the 'block' practical attendance.  Course requirements such as books and  optional equipment are extra as your need arises.  Next course ; begins July 2018.  ( A refundable deposit will be required to secure a place)  Ph 61 408 114 758  email: angelconch2@hotmail.com  angels.horses@gmail.com  Let me know your country/state and circumstances.  Note: Practitioners may need to be aware of the various laws which may apply in  their country or state,  and the insurance coverage which may be available.  Presented by Allan Moffatt B.Sc, B.Acup.  Director - ICET (International College of Equine and Canine Therapies)            #^$   Natural Animal Health       Home  Treatment Laws  Chiropractic  Physiotherapy  Massage  Acupuncture  Homoeopathy  Aromatherapy  Glucosamine  Cortaflex  Hydrotherapy  Herbs  Ragwort               UK site, established in 2001, explaining many of the complementary veterinary therapies available to support the health of horses, dogs, other animals and pets, including:   Descriptions of each therapy, how they work and what health benefits they can bring to dogs and horses    Directory of Complementary 
  Therapists , Vets offering 
  Complementary therapies & animal swimming 
  pools    The Laws which govern the treatment of animals and pets - who can, and who can't, treat your animal      Directories  Help with your dog or horse...   Trained and qualified Animal Therapists and  Dog Swimming Pools   Vets offering  complementary therapies   Glucosamine  sulphate  What manufacturers of Glucosamine sulphate supplements often fail to  tell you.  Cortaflex   Cortaflex now fortified with Hyaluronic  Acid    Appeal  World Horse Welfare  Stop the inhumane treatment of horses for slaughter. This is even more important in light of the horsemeat scandal!  Every year around 100,000 horses suffer the most horrific  journeys to European slaughterhouses... journeys of over 72 hours without  food or water in overcrowded lorries... frightened, exhausted and dehydrated...  just to end up on someone's dinner plate...  Stop these unnecessary & inhumane journeys by joining World Horse Welfare's " Live Transportation " campaign.     Animal Health and the Law  Much of the information about animal treatment and health found on the Internet comes from the USA. It is important to realise that the Laws in the UK are very different and what is OK overseas, is often against the Law in the UK - see the links down the right-hand side of this page.  Horses feature prominently on this site but in most cases Complementary Therapies apply equally to dogs, cats and other animals and pets. It's just that many of the advances in Veterinary Medicine have come about through research funded (either directly or indirectly) by the equine industry so there is more information/research available with an equine "bias". In many cases, innovations have been developed in the field of Equine Veterinary Medicine and then been modified and transferred to the treatment of dogs and other animals.  You can find details of many Complementary Veterinary Therapies:- by using the buttons down the left of the page - marked Chiropractic , Physiotherapy , Massage , Herbs (herbal medicine) including Ayurveda and the use of Indian Herbs following Ayurvedic traditions, Acupuncture and Homeopathy . Hydrotherapy is swimming (!) and this section reports on the health benefits to dogs and horses. The page about Glucosamine explains the problems with this supplement and a solution which has proved effective in the treatment of disease like arthritis and other forms of DJD (degenerative joint disease) in dogs, horses and other animals. Some of the therapies can only be given by a veterinary surgeon whilst others, mainly those involving manipulation, can be given under veterinary referral by a suitably trained and qualified Animal Therapist .  Throughout this site we refer to "your animal" and as most of the holistic therapies featured here apply, mainly although not exclusively, to equines and canines - for "your animal" please read "dogs" and/or "horses".  Check our links to Veterinary health resources.  Glucosamine Sulphate  Most people know that glucosamine sulphate is good for the joints - just look at all the glucosamine supplements on the shelves of health food shops and animal feed shops - but do you know how glucosamine works? Do you know that there is a big problem because of the size of glucosamine molecules... a problem that means it doesn't work as effectively as it could?  See our article about glucosamine sulphate and you will see how this problem can be overcome and find out what makes the world's top selling glucosamine supplement work more effectively than the others - for your horse, your dog, even for you!  Ragwort   Our section about Ragwort shows you what it looks like in both the rosette stage and the stem and flower stage, and explains the Laws which are relevant in the control of this poisonous weed:   Control of Weeds Act 1959  Ragwort Control Act 2004   We also explain  how you can get rid of this poisonous weed from your area.  There is also a new Code of Practice on How to Prevent the Spread of Ragwort...   Cortaflex - for joint mobility  Cortaflex is the number one selling joint supplement in the world - for horses, dogs, cats and humans. It is proven to be more effective than any other glucosamine sulphate and chondroitin sulphate supplement because its unique formulation. Glucosamine and chondroitin molecules are too large to pass effectively from the bloodstream into the cells where they are needed. Instead of these large molecules, Cortaflex contains the much smaller amino-acids and aminosaccharides from which glucosamine and chondroitin are made.  These smaller molecules easily pass into the cells and enable the cells to make their own glucosamine and chondroitin. You can learn more about this mechanism on our page about glucosamine sulphate .  See our other resources about Cortaflex .  Hyaluronic Acid  Most formulations of Cortaflex now contain hyaluronic acid - a major component of synovial fluid (joint oil). This is essential for absorbing concussion in the joints and and provides cartilage with the essential nutrients and lubrication for free movement of the joints. Find out more about hyaluronic acid .    Animal Treatment Law  The Law is very specific about who can give treatment to an animal.  Animal Treatment Laws  Protection of Animals Act  Veterinary Surgeons Act  Veterinary Exemptions  Cortaflex  Find out why Cortaflex is the best selling joint supplement in the world!  For Humans as well as Dogs and Horses!  Directories  Animal Therapists  Vets offering "Alternative" Therapies  Canine Hydrotherapy Centres         Directories  Animal Therapists  Complementary Therapy Vets  Site Map    Animal Laws  Animal Treatment Laws  Protection of Animals Act  Veterinary Surgeons Act  Veterinary Exemptions    About Us  Privacy  Contact  Links  Reviews     © Natural Animal Health 2001-2016   #^$               ×         MENU +     Home   Shop  Shop   Vision  Health  Services  Pets  Pets     Wellness  Natural Pet Care  Pet Health Checklist  Your Aging Pet  Pet Eye Care    Pet Vision  Cataracts  Eye Infections  Diabetic Retinopathy  Glaucoma  Retinal Degeneration  Retinal Tear/Detachment      Contact        Home   Pets       845.255.8222    share  tweet        Natural Pet Health Information  By  your request ...  Many of you have successfully used our products for your pets and have requested more pet care info.   Featuring:   Pet wellness tips  Caring for your aging pet  The Holistic Vet, Dr. Beatrice Ehrsam       With a balanced diet, appropriate exercise, and your attention to their silent (and vocal!) messages, there is no reason that your pet, your dog or cat, cannot live a long, full, and happy life. With that in mind, we have been working with our holistic vet, Dr. Beatrice Ehrsam, to develop natural recommendations for you.    Here is our pet health information about:   Anxiety  Arthritis  Cataracts  Diarrhea & Gas  Eye Infections  Diabetic Retinopathy  Doggy Breath for Pets  Glaucoma  Liver Conditions  Retinal Degeneration  Retinal Tear | Detachment  Skin & Coat  Urinary  Urinary Incontinence            Home  Products  Vision Nutrient Advice  Eye Conditions  Contact  Privacy/Policies  Sitemap  Disclaimer  © 2003-2018, NaturalEyeCare,™Inc., All rights reserved..    845.255.8222 3 Paradies Lane New Paltz, NY 12561              #^$   Loading Website...  If your browser does not redirect you, please click here . #^$  Home Crystals Learn Pets Aromatherapy Contact Blog More Healing Crystals for Massage & Meditation Crystal Meditation Open your mind, still your body and free your spirit to be more receptive to the healing energy of crystals. Exfoliation Massage Learn Massage Combine the benefits of Massage, Essential Oils and Crystals to balance and harmonize your whole being. 1/11 Aromatherapy for Pets    Aroma Inhalers  reduce anxiety  increase focus for training Aromatherapy for Pets Aromatherapy for Pets - help for reducing anxiety, panic and focusing the mind for training. Orange Calcite Heart Learn Back Massage Biscuit wearing the Rhodonite Charm Rhodonite is the rescue stone - eases emotional trauma, inspires compassion, generosity, love. Helps a pet accept a new addition to the home. Show More Crystals    Spheres , Palm Stones , Hearts , Eggs & Wands  for Massage & Meditation Learn Massage    Aromatherapy Crystal Massage,  Hot Stone Massage,  Rainforest Massage  Private or group instruction in-home or salon or online! Crystals for Pets    Crystal Massage Kits &  Healing Crystal Pet Charms  balance emotions  reduce stress  boost immune and more...  #^$           800-PET-HLTH                            Home    Retail Store    Shop Online    Resources    Nutrition    Blog    Contact                          Our Commitment to Your Pet's Health Care  Let's face it:  Wading through the information available on nutrition, medicine, and well-being for your companion animal can be confusing and rife with contradictions.  We're here to clarify - to help you to understand the foundation of your pet's nutritional needs and the importance of honoring the species-specific needs of your dog or cat. Whether you visit our 2,500-square foot brick-and-mortar store in Alexandria, VA, shop our online store , peruse our resource list , visit our online library , attend one or two of our seminars , or speak with an expert face to face, there is a spectrum of PetSage resources to choose from. Holistic Pet Products. PetSage offers a vast selection of holistic remedies -- from herbal to flower essences and from homeopathy to nutritional supplements -- for a wide range of health and behavior issues. Our staff can help you and your veterinarian select and integrate the appropriate remedy or supplement into your pet's care. Trained Store Staff . PetSage staff are trained in key specialties of companion animal well-being. We do not diagnose or treat illnesses , but we can thoughtfully discuss nutritional or natural therapies to help you understand healthful options. Nutritional Counseling . The most important ingredient in your pet's health and longevity is a proper diet. For 20 plus years, Terri Grow has applied exacting standards in the sourcing and manufacturing of products offered at PetSage. Her experience will help you separate fact from fiction to find the right food for your pet. Then, if you begin to reach beyond the pet food shelf and research making your pet's food, Terri can help you cultivate your ideas--from homemade treats to specialty diets. Pet Health Care Coaching .  We can help you customize your pet's nutritional and holistic health care plan with a Pet Health Care Coach.  We try to answer brief questions in the aisles of our store or online, but often a more in-depth discussion is required.  Individual appointments are available with a Pet Health Care Coach by calling the store or submitting a request via our contact form . Online Reference Library  and Blog . Years of experience, along with great guest authors, helped us to amass a rich and growing library of articles detailing case studies, helpful hints, and in-depth discussion of animal health care concepts.  Founder and President Terri Grow's informative and popular blog keeps you up to date on the latest on PetSage's radar screen. Health and Well-Being Seminars. Whether the topic is nutrition, behavior, or first aid, our educational events assist you in becoming a more informed and knowledgeable advocate for your furry companion         P etSage has such a wonderful way of educating clients and inspiring them to find more answers. ~ Vicki Farthing, DVM , Animal Center at Concord Farm    It's time again for Olive's Retreat!  PetSage will be closed Tuesday, May 15th thru Saturday, May 19th. We'll reopen Tuesday, May 22nd at 10am.         Offering Nutritional Counseling at Veterinary Holistic Center. For information and scheduling, contact PetSage or VHCNOVA.com .      Wednesdays Are Savings Days for Seniors and Active Duty Personnel! Every Wednesday is Savings Day for Seniors (59 and older . . . yes, humans), along with ACTIVE Duty Military and First Responders. Take advantage of 10% discount on food, treats and accessories EVERY Wednesday. ID required.    PETSAGE HAPPENINGS      Store Hours & Directions    Retail Hours: 10am-5pm Tues.- Fri. 9-2pm Saturday   2391 S Dove Street Alexandria, VA 22314 800.738.4584 Or shop our online store    Directions                            ABOUT PETSAGE                HOLISTIC PET CARE | ONLINE ORDERING | PET FOOD | PET HEALTH COACHING | PET DIETS | PET TOYS | DIRECTIONS & HOURS | CONTACT       © 2013  PetSage, All Rights Reserved         1-800-PET-HLTH       The products and information offered on this site are not intended to take the place of veterinary care, nor to prescribe any alternative course of therapy for your pet. Consult your veterinarian if you suspect your pet has a health related problem. Advise your veterinarian of your interest in alternative and complementary therapies and if you are giving your pet natural therapies.                   ✕        About      Meet the Staff      Store Directions & Hours         Resources      Library      Holistic Thoughts on FAQs      Events      Pet Health Coaching         Classes & Seminars      Thoughts & Articles      Dog & Cat Recipes    #^$   Huntington Beach Reiki     Home  About Me  reiki your pet store         Reiki healing for your pets and you    The name Reiki, pronounced ''Ray-key'', comes from the Japanese words ''rei'' meaning spirit, and ''ki'' meaning energy. It is usually translated as ''universal life energy.''  Reiki is a gentle, noninvasive holistic energy healing system that yields powerful results for the body, mind and spirit. When using Reiki to heal, the practitioner channels healing energy through her hands to the client either directly or from a distance. It is ideal for use with animals because with Reiki, the animal controls the treatment, accepting Reiki in the ways that are most comfortable. Easy for people to learn and use, Reiki can do no harm, even when used by the most novice practitioner. It always goes to the source of the problem and always works for the highest good.      Reiki is ideal for use with animals because it is gentle and noninvasive. It doesn't cause stress, discomfort, or pain, and yet yields powerful results. Animals respond intuitively to Reiki's power to heal emotional, behavioral, and physical illnesses and injuries.  For animals who are healthy, Reiki helps to maintain their health, enhances relaxation and provides an emotional sense of peace and contentment.  For animals who are ill, Reiki is a wonderful healing method as well as a safe complement to Western Medicine, Chinese Medicine, homeopathy, flower essences, and all other forms of healing. For example, Reiki can reduce the side effects of chemotherapy, support an acupuncture treatment, and enhance the effects of flower essences and other  healing methods, both holistic and allopathic.  For dying animals, Reiki is a powerful yet gentle way to provide comfort, relief from pain, fear, and anxiety, and to ease the transition to death        Help your pets feel better now Animal Reiki classes available. Reiki works well with animals for the same reasons it works well on 
children and people of all ages. Have you ever noticed that when you pet
 an animal, he rolls over to receive more or looks at you with 
lovey-dovey eyes or sighs?  Animals respond to your loving touch and intention. Reiki is another way to help your animals feel better.  You can give Reiki to animals in the following situations:  When they are ill: Reiki helps the healing process and works with any type of medical intervention.  When they are young or old: You can use Reiki on an animal of any age or situation.  When they have been through a trauma: Animals can use 
loving energy after they've experienced any type of abuse, loss, or 
move, or if they seem to exhibit depression or other behavioral 
disorder. Even if you don't know what the problem is, you can use Reiki 
to help.  Learn how to heal your pets. Huntington Beach Reiki helps the community by volunteering at local rescues. Join us    Watch our video at Hanaeleh Horse Rescue        Rates for healing      Distant and in-person sessions in the Orange County, California Area    FREE Distant healing    In your home for pet  $ 40.00    If you cannot afford  the $ 40.00, I will work something out. I will never turn an animal down. They all need healing.        Let me help your pets     E- mail me kerri_draper@hotmail.com            I also offer free Reiki to women with cancer.      http://www.freereiki4cancer.com                       Custom Search            Designed by Free CSS Templates      Make a Free Website with Yola.           #^$                                                 Holistic Care for Animals by Taranet     Home About Taranet What We Do At Taranet Animal Care Business Consultancy Advertising at Taranet Special Offer Business Tips - Animal Therapists Business Motivation Website Tips Social Media for Animal Care Businesses Social Media Guide Social Media Training Cancellation Policy Privacy Policy Terms and Conditions Directory of Complementary Therapies for Animals Acupuncture Aloe Vera for Animals Animal Aromatics Animal Communication Bach Flower Remedies Bee Products for Animal Health Canine Massage Cat & Canine Muscle Release Therapy Chiropractic for Animals Colour & Light Therapy Copper Therapy for Animals Cryotherapy Crystal Therapy for Animals EMLD Equine & Canine Bodywork Equine & Canine Craniosacral Equine & Canine Bowen Therapy Equine & Canine Touch Equine Muscle Release Therapy Equine Sports Massage Hawthorn for Animals Herbs for Animal Health Homeopathy for Animals Holistic Animal Care Sarcoids & Holistic Therapies Sweet Itch & Holistic Care Mud Fever & Holistic Therapies Loud Noises & Animals Laminitis & Horses Older Animals & Holistic Care Tendon Injuries & Animals Osteoarthritis Five Element Theory Summer Healthcare for Animals Hydrotherapy for Animals Iridology for Animals Kinesiology for Animals Magnotherapy for Animals Marshmallow for Animals Myotherapy for Animals Osteopathy for Animals Pranic Healing for Animals Physiotherapy for Animals Radionics for Animals Reiki for Animals Seaweed for Animals Shiatsu for Animals Veterinary Thermography Training - Animal Training Links - Animal Health Canine Bowen Therapy Training Canine Massage Training Advice Chiropractic Animal Training Equine Bowen Therapy Training EMLD Training Advice Equine Massage Training Osteopathy Animal Training Physiotherapy Animal Training Insurance Noticeboard & Events Animal Care WebLinks Research - Animal Health SiteMap                     Holistic Care for Animals by Taranet        Helping Your Animals - Naturally!              Home                  Holistic Insights For Your Animal’s Health and Your Animal Care Business Here at Taranet we adore animals, and through our independent and international consultancy our aims are:  to share how a holistic approach can be useful for animals; to help animal care businesses to be successful; Whether you’re a pet owner, equestrian business, farmer or other animal carer, we aim to help you help your animals with straightforward advice - wherever you are in the world, (although we're based in the UK). Are you an equestrian, dog or other animal related business and like specialist support to get your business thriving? Get in contact for details of our consultancy and social media training. Get more information on our services, by clicking the boxes below!                          Explore more by visiting our site map or pressing the button at the top right of the page for the navigation menu                Or to discover more about the fantastic Forever business/earnings opportunity, visit the special website here . Suzanne Harris at Taranet is an Independent Business Owner of Forever Living Products. (Aloe Vera drinks, supplements, skincare and personal care products).  Join Taranet's Email List For Email Marketing you can trust.            Healthy Animals Naturally                       © 2018 Taranet    Tel: 07796 882396 Contact Us                #^$­       Menu       Home About  Opening Hours Contact Us Staff Chipperfield Clinic Location Treatments  Acupuncture Animal Physiotherapy Small Animal Hydrotherapy McTimoney Hydro Treadmill Equipment Hire CPD/Events CHARITY SUMMER EVENT Testimonials  Canine Testimonials Equine Testimonials News                               Tel : 01923 260012 Fax:  01923 261102     info@theravet.com This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.   Jacks Unit, The Common Chipperfield Hertfordshire WD4 9BL                        Home About  Opening Hours Contact Us Staff Chipperfield Clinic Location Treatments  Acupuncture Animal Physiotherapy Small Animal Hydrotherapy McTimoney Hydro Treadmill Equipment Hire CPD/Events CHARITY SUMMER EVENT Testimonials  Canine Testimonials Equine Testimonials News                                                                                                                                                  VETERINARY  HYDROTHERAPY & PHYSIOTHERAPY HERTFORDSHIRE     Theravet was established in 2000 to provide a dedicated centre of excellence for the provision of animal hydrotherapy and physiotherapy to the veterinary profession and their clients.  The Fleet centre was purpose built in 2000 for canine and small animal referrals and private enquiries from Hampshire, Berkshire, Surrey and beyond and the equine service is provided on a mobile basis.  In 2012 the brand new Chipperfield site was designed and purpose built to service clients in Hertfordshire, Bedfordshire, Buckinghamshire and Greater London. The Chipperfield practice opened end of April 2013. For inquiries please call 01923 260012  The equine service is provided on a mobile basis.  Over the last 10 years Theravet has built a reputation for excellence in the South, servicing clients across the spectrum from charity work to royal racehorses and taking referrals from as far afield as Europe and the USA.  All our staff are chosen for their professionalism, experience and personal skills, but importantly also for their love and dedication to your pets. We recognise that peoples pets are very much part of the family and as such, our care and thought for your pet is an essential part of what makes our team excel.      Download Veterinary Referral/Consent Form              Contact Us     Tel :  01923 260012  Fax : 01923 261102  email - info@theravet.com This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.  Opening Hours : Mon 10.30-7.00, Tues 10.30-7.00, Weds 9.00-6.00, Thurs 10.30-7.00, Fri 9.00-7.00, Sat 9.00-7  Follow us :     Sponsors of the Olympia Jumping Winner 2017 and England team member for the World Agility Open 2018                             RCVS  ACPAT  Canine Hydrotherapy   IRVAP   McTimoney Association                                                     ^ Back To Top#^$          Home  Diagnose  Learn  Research  About Us  Contact Us  Seminars  Our Sponsors  Find A Vet            Top Animal Health Concerns For Veterinary Professionals    Click here to see the Top Animal Health Concerns for Pet Owners    Canine   Osteoarthritis  Diabetes Mellitus  Lymphosarcoma  Renal Disease  Heartworm  Influenza H3N1  Otitis  Drug Resistance  Dental Disease  Dermatitis    MORE   Feline   Osteoarthritis  Diabetes Mellitus  Hyperthyroidism  Lymphosarcoma  Renal Disease  FLUTD  Inappropriate Elimination  Cardiomyopathy  Chronic Diarrhea  Otitis  Drug Resistance  Dental Disease    MORE   Equine   Osteoarthritis  Colic  Reactive Airway Disease  Neurologic Disease (EPM)  Dermatitis / Pruritus  Hepatitis  Lamintis  Cushings / Insulin resistance  Uveitis  Gastric Ulcer Disease (EGUS)  Chronic Diarrhea    MORE      Top Animal Health Concerns For Pet Owners     Dogs   Arthritis   Diabetes  Lymphoma  Renal - Kidney Disease  Heartworm  Flu H3N8  Diarrhea  Ear Infection  Drug Resistance  Dental Disease  Skin Hot Spots    MORE   Cats   Arthritis  Diabetes  Hyperthyroidism  Lymphoma  Renal - Kidney Disease  Urinary Tract Infection  Inappropriate Elimination  Heart Disease  Chronic Diarrhea  Ear Infection  Drug Resistance  Dental Disease    MORE   Horses   Arthritis   Cushings / Insulin Resistance  Neurologic Disease (EPM)  Skin Inflammation  Eye Disease  Colic    MORE     Support For Your Animals     Veterinarians' Desk 
               Reference To Integrative 
               Medicine  Diagnose Symptoms 
              &  Treatments  Read Articles About 
               Integrative Medicine  Dictionary, Learn 
               Integrative Medicine
               Terms  Research Websites & 
             Periodicals  Seminars, CE Courses & 
               Conferences  Find A Holistic  Veterinarian  Visit Our 
            Sponsors       Flash version 9,0 or greater is required You have no flash plugin installed Click here to download latest version        Home    There is a dramatic paradigm shift occurring in the animal health care world.
				This new paradigm, which is called Integrative Medicine, takes a more holistic
				approach to the treatment of animal disorders than the
				present traditional medical model which focuses mainly on
				pharmacological solutions.    The Veterinary Institute of Integrative Medicine (VIIM) was formed
				to bring integrative medicine to the forefront of animal
				healing. It was established by a group of leading veterinary
				doctors who were concerned that veterinarians and animal owners were not
				fully aware of the benefits of integrative approaches to healing animals. The
				mission of the Institute is to create resources to help educate veterinarians
			  and dog, cat & horse owners about holistic veterinary medicine.      Quick Reference to How We Support You:      Veterinarians' Desk Reference To Integrative Medicine  Diagnose Symptoms & Treatments  Read Articles About Integrative Medicine  Dictionary Learn  Integrative Medicine Terms  Research Websites & Periodicals     Find A Holistic Veterinarian  Seminars, CE Courses & Conferences  Visit Our Sponsors           Who This Site is For    The Veterinary Institute has developed this web site so that veterinarians
				 and animal owners alike will have a comprehensive source of  scientific-based
				 knowledge from which to draw upon to help our animals
				 live longer; healthier and happier lives. Unfortunately, in
				 the animal health world much of the information and
				 research on integrative medicine you find on the web is
				 of poor quality. Our goal at the Institute is to help more
				 animals heal by providing the most trusted, up to date
				 and easy to understand scientific knowledge available
			   anywhere.     Our Support Services In Detail        Get Free Online Access To The Veterinarians’ Desk Reference     In response to the growing demand by the veterinary
				  community for information on nutraceuticals and natural
				  medicine, the veterinarians at the Veterinary Institute
				  of Integrative Medicine (VIIM) have produced the Veterinarians'
				  Desk Reference of Integrative Medicines (VDR). The VDR
				  provides veterinarians with a comprehensive manual
				  on using animal health products. While animal owners 
				  may refer to the Veterinary Desk Reference, we make
				  it available only so that consumers may have more
				  informed interactions with their veterinarian. We urge
				  consumers to make no medical decisions without a  consultation with
				their veterinarian.        Find an Integrative Veterinarian Near You       The Veterinary Institute of Integrative Medicine has  recently edited
its database of holistic veterinarians so that animal owners  
can find a veterinarian to support them in helping their animal 
heal with an integrative approach. Click to visit our Find an Integrative Vet page .  For additional listings of holistic veterinarians, visit
				  the websites of these professional organizations for a
				  directory of their members:    • American Holistic Veterinary Medical Association - www.ahvma.org • International Veterinary Acupuncture Society - www.ivas.org • American Academy of Veterinary Acupuncture - www.aava.org • American Veterinary Chiropractic Association - www.avca.com  If you are a veterinarian that utilizes an integrative  approach and would like to be added to our database, please submit your information  on the Vet Data Update page.  Find a Vet     More Ways We Help Your Animals  Heal       Research
		  Links & Periodicals  To give you more in-depth 
information, the Veterinary 
Institute of Integrative 
Medicine has endeavored to 
identify the best of the 
integrative medicine 
research links and periodicals
to keep you current on 
relevant, cutting-edge 
studies and news.  Click Here      Diagnose Symptoms & Treatments  This is a quick reference to 
			the therapeutic product index 
			for the veterinarian, 
			categorized by disorder, as 
			compared to product name 
			and product mode of action. 
			This makes it easier to use in a 
			clinical setting.      Click Here      Dictionary of Integrative Medicine  The Veterinary Institute of 
			Integrative Medicine provides 
			you with a quick guide to 
			help you have a better 
			understanding of Integrative 
			Medicine terms.          Click Here        Seminar, CE Courses & Conferences;  Industry news and perspectives 
			and cutting-edge medical/scientific reports are just a 
			click away. We’ve stream-lined 
			the time it takes you to stay up
to date on the latest data vital 
to your practice and your 
ongoing education.  Click Here      Visit Our Sponsors  We only work with sponsors 
			who are committed to 
			healing animals and embrace
			an Integrative approach to 
			animal health. We urge you 
			to visit our sponsor page to 
			learn more about these 
			worthwhile companies and 
			how they can support your 
			animal’s health.     Click Here      Articles About Integrative Medicine  The top animal health 
			concerns for Veterinary
			Professionals such as 
			Osteoarthritis/ Degenerative 
			Joint Disease, Diabetes 
			Mellitus, Chronic Diarrhea, 
			Inflammatory Bowel Disease 
			(IBD), Lymphoma, Renal 
			Disease Resistance & many 
			more...    Click Here           Send to a Friend   Enter an email address below to send this page to a friend:           Veterinarians' Desk Reference To Integrative
Medicine       Find A Holistic Veterinarian    Support Our Sponsors                             #^$               Contact Us 24 hours  0844 544 3314  Calls cost 7p per minute plus your phone company's access charge        REQUEST A CALLBACK     If you want us to call you back, simply fill in this form and we will get back to you.                  Submit       Request a callback              ≡       Home  About Us   Our Background     Thermography   As a Diagnostic Tool  History of Thermography  How A Thermal Imaging Camera Works  Thermal Imaging Technology  Animal Case Studies  Thermal Imaging Gallery     Our Services   Equine Thermography   Saddle Fitting & Rider Training  Dental Problems  Muscle Problems & Injury  Hoof Balance & Foot Problems  Ligaments & Tendons  Nerve Damage & Injury  Joint and Skeletal Problems  Back Problems & Pain     Agility & Working Dogs  Greyhounds and Racing Dogs  Companion Animals  Arthritis Detection in Cat and Dogs  Livestock Thermography  Zoo, Wildlife and Marine     FLIR Cameras   Veterinary Thermal Imaging Cameras  Camera Range & Price List     Contact Us                                                       Benefits of Thermal Imaging  Thermography provides a visual management tool for owners and professionals diagnosing, monitoring or treating injury, illness or disease. A valuable addition to existing diagnostic tools such as X-rays, MRI scans and Ultrasound offered by your Vet, Veterinary Thermal Imaging is non-invasive, emits no radiation, can be repeated as frequently as required and can eliminate the need for other expensive investigations.     Benefits             What Thermography Shows  Thermal Imaging graphically maps the skin surface temperature, providing an objective view of the subjective feeling of pain. Physiological changes occur in response to underlying anatomical disruption, and can show whilst tissues are under stress, before major injury occurs. Normally there is a symmetrical skin surface temperature pattern which is consistent and reproducible for any individual animal.     Case Studies             Our Thermal Imaging Services  We are the first UK company to work across all species; equine, companion, livestock, marine and zoo animals, taking both static and dynamic thermographic images. Working under a code of conduct we provide thermography reports for owners and professionals after Veterinary referral, in addition to consultancy services to both the private and public sector.     Services                                              Thermography   History of Thermography  Our Services  Animal Case Studies  FLIR Camera Sales  Work With Animals        About   Terms of Use  Privacy Policy  Terms of Business  Important Notice          Useful Links   FLIR Thermography  Royal College of Veterinary Surgeons  UK Thermography Association  European Association of Thermology        Connect   Twitter    Facebook                © 2016 Veterinary Thermal Imaging Limited. Registered in England and Wales. Registration No 7159409. Fairmeed, Hale House Lane, Churt, Surrey, GU10 2JG.             #^$ Loading ...     Sorry, an error occurred while loading the content.             ⌂ Home Mail Flickr Tumblr News Sports Finance Entertainment Lifestyle Answers Groups Mobile More ⋁ Weather Politics Tech Shopping     Yahoo Groups                         👤  Sign in     ✉  Mail      ⚙  Help     Account Info  Help  Suggestions                   Welcome to Yahoo Groups.   An extension to your real life group of friends, interests and communities.  What's new : see video         Sign In  OR  Start a New Group  You must be a registered Yahoo user to start a group. Sign Up                         Browse Groups               Guidelines   Feedback   Help   Blog                Animal Reiki Source is a Public Group with 1180 members.   Animal Reiki Source     Public Group,  1180 members          Primary Navigation    Conversations  Photos  Files  Attachments  Events  Polls  Links  Database  About   More    Secondary Navigation   Help          Attachments  Events  Polls  Links  Database  About       Edit Membership                     Back     About Group       Join Group           , added in the last 7 days         Group Description   Welcome Animal Reiki practitioners! This group is for students, clients and friends of Animal Reiki Source. Kathleen has created this group as a place of love and light to share Animal Reiki stories and knowledge, ask questions, receive support, and create Animal Reiki conversations and friendships across the miles.  As a member of our group, you may also decide to join our Animal Healing Circle: a group of Reiki practitioners who offer free distant healings to animals in need. You can join either as a participating practitioner, or ask for distant treatment for an animal in your life.  The Animal Healing Circle is led and supported by John Sawyer (http://www.critterreiki.com) and me.  As we join our hands in this work, we support each other in improving the health and wellness of our beloved animal companions.  Wishing you many Animal Reiki Blessings,  Kathleen Prasad, Founder and Director, Animal Reiki Source  Website: www.animalreikisource.com Facebook: www.facebook.com/AnimalReikiSource Twitter: twitter.com/ARS_animalreiki Nonprofit: www.shelteranimalreikiassociation.org     Group Website  http://www.animalreikisource.com    Group Information   Members : 1180  Category : Reiki  Founded : Mar 31, 2006  Language : English     Group Settings    This is a public group.  Attachments are permitted.  Members cannot hide email address.  Listed in Yahoo Groups directory.    Membership does not require approval.  Messages from new members require approval.  All members can post messages.      Group Email Addresses   Post Message : animalreikisource@yahoogroups.com  Subscribe : animalreikisource-subscribe@yahoogroups.com  Unsubscribe : animalreikisource-unsubscribe@yahoogroups.com  List Owner : animalreikisource-owner@yahoogroups.com     Message History                                                Enhance your New Tab experience Customize your New Tab with Yahoo search, Flickr photos, top sites & more. Add it now!#^$                                                                                                                                       Welcome to Blakkatz for April 19, 2018  Welcome to Blakkatz   Since 1997, Blakkatz has been a source for information on natural cat care.  I have been raising my cats naturally since 1993.  This means they've been fed a home-prepared raw meat diet (no commercial food at all), I've given them no vaccinations (except for what is required by law) and use homeopathy rather than conventional medicine to treat any illnesses.  I raised five generations of cats in this manner.  Interested in learning more about natural rearing?  Order a copy of Raising Cats Naturally: How to care for your cat the way nature intended.  I am no longer breeding American Shorthairs, but still maintain a colony of 13 or more cats and kittens exclusively on a raw diet. I moved to North Carolina in 2002 and in 2008 started Spellcast Farm . The cats are all "working" cats now. They keep the rodent population down. At Spellcast Farm, we raise meat rabbits on pasture, dairy goats, meat sheep and a flock of heritage breed ducks. The cats and dogs of Spellcast Farm are lucky to be able to dine on healthy, grass-fed meat.          Written and maintained by Michelle T. Bernard    Last modified 04/19/2018 10:56:27         #^$              Search               Toggle Navigation         Home Happy Healthy Well-Fed Healing Books-n-Things About us Forum   You are here:   Home            Amazon   Please support Holisticat by ordering from Amazon using the link below         Donation   Countless $, hours, and other forms of toil and hard work have gone into providing this comprehensive, detailed, lovingly crafted and maintained site. If you've been helped by the information on Holisticat's website and/or forums, and would like to help us keep it updated to continue to help cats for many more years to come, click on the button below to link you to Paypal (you do not need an account):       Paypal is a secure and easy way to pay with either credit card or bank account. You do not need a PayPal account. If you would like to mail a check, please contact us for an address. There is no tax deduction for this donation because we're not a 5013C organization; maybe some day to help with our kitten/cat rescue efforts...                  Welcome to Holisticat     (We appreciate your patience while this site is under construction)  The One, The Only, The Original gentle care and rawfeeding resource for cats since 1997  Supporting care-givers at every point in the journey to good nutrition, including commercial, cooked and raw diets.  Hosting on-going discussions of a full range of gentle, natural and safe methods for prevention and treatment of diseases on the member-supported forums.  Building an up-to-date and growing body of knowledge based on reviews of publicly available scientific research and 16-plus years of members' experiences.  If you are a first-time visitor, we hope you enjoy your visit, and come back often.  Featuring ...   Convenient search area  Language translations in French, German, Italian, Spanish, and Turkish  The Community Board, up and running since the beginning of 2007  Sandy is now offering in-depth individual consultations   For current members, we hope you enjoy the new look and functionality of the site!  Please visit often, and more articles will be posted regularly.  Famous Boo Boo: The Inspiration for Holisticat  This is handsome, fuzzy Boo-Boo bear, the loving inspiration for the Holisticat Community Board and this website.  Read Booey's story about his courageous battle with Chronic Renal Failure and Hypertrophic Cardiomyopathy.      Home Happy Healthy Well-Fed Healing Books-n-Things About us Forum            Back to Top   © 2018 Holisticat   #^$